Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Number of Reviews
42

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: George Clooney, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Chris O'Donnell, 
      Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, 
      Elle Macpherson, John Glover, Jeep Swenson
Director: Joel Schumacher
Producer: Peter MacGregor-Scott
Screenplay: Akiva Goldsman, based on characters created by Bob Kane
Cinematography: Stephen Goldblatt
Music: Elliott Goldenthal
U.S. Distributor: Warner Brothers
     With BATMAN AND ROBIN, the fourth entry in the recent BATMAN movie 
series, the profitable franchise appears poised to take a nosedive.  
This film, which places yet another actor in the batsuit, has all the 
necessary hallmarks of a sorry sequel -- pointless, plodding plotting; 
asinine action; clueless, comatose characterization; and dumb dialogue.  
Sadly for all the batfans who have been waiting with baited breath for 
this one, BATMAN AND ROBIN has become the latest blight on the long 
summer movie season.
     Fetishists will probably love BATMAN AND ROBIN.  There are rubber 
nipples, crotch and butt shots as the dynamic duo (and later Batgirl) 
suit up, bikers and crooks decked out in kinky, CLOCKWORK ORANGE-like 
regalia, and Uma Thurman dressed and acting like a dominatrix.  It all 
goes nicely with the film's attempt at sensory overload.  Director Joel 
Schumacher has taken Tim Burton's dark vision of Gotham City and shifted 
it into overdrive.  This is a weird, wild, wacky world where gothic 
skyscrapers reach like twisted fingers into the clouds, and where the 
batsignal shines brighter than the moon.  However, like the movie as a 
whole, this aspect is as briefly captivating as it is hollow and 
soulless.  It quickly becomes clear that the picture's lone selling 
point is that it looks great, but, in an era when blockbuster budgets 
are routinely topping $100 million, that's no longer special. 
     Never has Batman been less believable or human.  It's not actor 
George Clooney's fault -- he gives it a game try, but, really, his 
function is to provide a body to put into the costume.  We see even less 
of Bruce Wayne's heart than we do of his face.  Gradually, over the 
previous three movies, bits and pieces of Batman's character began to 
surface.  Not so here.  All attempts at development are obligatory, 
perfunctory, and not terribly convincing.  The same is true of Chris 
O'Donnell's Robin, who comes across more as a spoiled brat with an ego 
problem than an integral member of an unusual family.  Then, to further 
complicate matters, yet another cardboard-thin hero is added in the 
person of Batgirl (Alicia Silverstone), who equals her caped cohorts 
when it comes to a ready supply of wisecracks and a lack of personality.
     In the previous BATMAN movies, the villains took center stage.  
First it was Jack Nicholson's Joker (BATMAN), then Danny DeVito's 
Penguin and Michelle Pfeiffer's Catwoman (BATMAN RETURNS), followed by 
Jim Carrey's Riddler and Tommy Lee Jones' Two-Face (BATMAN FOREVER).  
Now, Arnold Schwarzenegger and Uma Thurman add Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy 
to the roster.  These are the two least-interesting bad guys to date.  
Schwarzenegger, aside from looking like a cross between the Michelin Man 
and Robocop, appears totally confused about what he's doing.  Sometimes 
he's in TERMINATOR mode; on other occasions, he's chomping on a cigar 
like he's back in LAST ACTION HERO.  Meanwhile, Thurman manages to do a 
pale imitation of Carrey.  Her character is essentially a female 
representation of the Riddler (scientific experiments gone awry give a 
mentally-unstable nerd extraordinary powers), only far less engaging.  
There's also a hulk of a creature called Bane (Jeep Swenson), who's 
reduced to playing Oddjob to Poison Ivy's Goldfinger.  His fate is 
rather pathetic, which proves that it doesn't pay to be the henchman in 
a movie like this.
     There's actually a poignant story behind Freeze.  He's a one-time 
peace-loving scientist who became obsessed with saving his terminally 
ill wife, regardless of the cost.  The forces driving him are, 
therefore, incredibly complex -- too complex for Schwarzenegger to 
convey effectively (wasn't there a point when Patrick Stewart was being 
mentioned for this role?) or for Schumacher to care about exploring.  As 
a result, Mr. Freeze ends up being a frustratingly incomplete brute 
who's out to smother Gotham City under a blanket of ice.  
     Old friends like Commissioner Gordon (Pat Hingle) and the ever-
reliable Alfred (Michael Gough, gamely trying to give a serious 
performance amidst all this silliness) are back.  Both of these men have 
kept the same face while the lead character has gone through three 
changes.  Supermodel-turned-actress Elle Macpherson is one of many 
newcomers, but her role as Bruce Wayne's girlfriend is so small that 
she's reduced to a background decoration.  
     At times, BATMAN AND ROBIN comes close to matching the tone of the 
'60s TV series.  Only two things are missing:  the on-screen cartoon 
captions ("pow!" "bam!") and an Adam West cameo.  Meanwhile, anyone who 
comes to BATMAN AND ROBIN expecting great action sequences will be 
disappointed.  The fight scenes aren't interesting -- they're poorly 
choreographed, badly edited, and interrupted by too many one-liners.  
The "hockey team from hell" sequence is a perfect example:  it seems to 
go on forever, but we're never really sure exactly what's happening (or 
why it's happening, for that matter).
     BATMAN AND ROBIN moves at a dizzying pace, yet goes absolutely 
nowhere.  Somewhere between the quarter and mid-point of this film, 
things turn repetitious and tedious.  We see basically the same fight 
scene re-enacted three or four times -- and it isn't all that impressive 
on the first occasion.  We become numb to the glitz and glamour, but, 
looking beyond it, we see only a vacuum.  In trying to put the "comic" 
back into "comic book", Schumacher has reduced BATMAN to the equivalent 
of a daily newspaper strip -- disjointed and painfully shallow.  The 
character probably deserves more respect, but, in BATMAN AND ROBIN, he 
doesn't get it.  And, for that matter, neither does the audience.
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Chuck Dowling
Batman and Robin (1997) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger,
George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Elle
Macpherson, John Glover, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, Jeep Swenson, Jesse
Ventura, Vendela, Vivica A. Fox, Coolio. Written by: Akiva Goldsman.
Directed by: Joel Schumacher. Running Time: 130 minutes.
Ed Wood is alive and working under the name Joel Schumacher! Run for your
lives! "Batman and Robin" is the fourth film in a movie series which, in a
span of only eight years, has managed to go from good to outstanding to bad
to stomach churning retartedness.
As the "film" begins, Batman and Robin are summoned to battle a new villain,
Mr. Freeze, who has broken into a museum and is attempting to steal a big
diamond to power his freeze machine (oh so THAT'S what diamonds are good
for). The opening scene manages to rival the opening scene of 1996's "Romeo
and Juliet" as the most ridiculous movie sequence ever put to film. Anyway,
soon they have to battle other villains as well, Poison Ivy (Thurman) and
Bane (Swenson).
George Clooney steps into the Batsuit this time and it's now official,
Batman has no personality whatsoever. It's not Clooney's fault, he's just
going by the script and by Schumacher's (shudder) direction. Batman is known
as the Dark Knight, meaning that Batman is supposed to have a dark, brooding
personality. Joel Schumacher (vomit) has managed to change all that over the
course of two films, as Batman is now a cartoon. He always has a lame pun to
spout out or an afterschool special message to deliver.
Speaking of puns, that's all Mr. Freeze has to say. He hardly has one line
of dialogue which doesn't involve a pun using any of the words: cool, cold,
ice, freeze or chill. After the first two, you're sick of it. But, alas, it
continues.
As with "Batman Forever", there are way too many characters. One villain is
all that's needed, not three. Bane is the worst of the three, which is
surprising because of what little I know of the comic books, Bane was a
major force. Here he's just a masked goon, grunting like Frankenstein's
monster. And he's also amazingly easy to defeat, as his weakness are these
big tubes coming out of his head. Pull one out, and he's dead. If he walks
into a coat rack, he's a goner. Poison Ivy is way too talky, and most of the
time she's babbling to herself, which is even more irritating.
Gotham City now represents a city which must exist on some other planet
other than Earth. The laws of gravity seem to have little effect in this
world. Also, it seems that no one really lives in Gotham, except for street
criminals, which makes me wonder why in a city protected by Batman would
there be the highest crime rate ever in the history of civilization?
Batman's not protecting anyone, as there's mass terror constantly going on
in the streets. Perhaps it's Joel Schumacher's (gag) views of capital
punishment at play here, because in both "Batman Forever" and here, long
speeches are given about how it would be wrong to kill the main villain
after he's been captured. Instead, to punish them for their crime of
attempted mass homicide, villains in Joel Schumacher's (puke) vision of
Gotham City get locked up in an asylum, which everyone knows they will break
out of in no time to kill more people.
To go into further detail about all the ridiculous aspects of this movie
would take a review longer than the written screenplay itself. So I'll just
mention the worst of the bunch. Now, when Alicia Silverstone becomes
Batgirl, she shows up late in the film to help Batman and Robin defeat
Poison Ivy. Now, keep in mind that Silverstone has been living in Wayne
Manor and chatting with Bruce Wayne and Dick Grayson for the entire film.
Also keep in mind that her Batgirl "disguise" wouldn't fool an infant.
Anyway, she arrives, cleans house, and then chats with Batman and Robin...
who DO NOT RECOGNIZE HER! She actually has to tell them who she is.
But the moment which made me groan the loudest comes at some sort of charity
auction where old men are bidding on scantily dressed women on stage. Poison
Ivy arrives and puts the audience under some sort of spell. Batman and
Robin, who are actually at a party dressed as Batman and Robin, are also
captivated by her spell. Soon the audience starts to bid on her, and Batman
and Robin join in on the bidding. Batman increases the bid to something like
seven million dollars, and then whips out, I kid you not, a Batman credit
card, complete with the Batman logo on it as well as "BATMAN" typed out on
it. This is absolutely the dumbest thing I have ever seen. Think about this
for a moment won't you? What bank honors this card? Did they call Batman to
offer him this special card? Only Batman can use this card, so do you think
Batman does his own shopping? Perhaps goes to Ace Hardware to pick up some
more Batapults and charges them to the Batcard? At that moment it became
true, the Batman movie series, which once prided itself from being 180
degrees different in tone and style from the campy 60s TV show, is now just
as good as the WORST episodes of that TV series.
I do give the film credit for two things. One is the casting of Arnold
Schwarzenegger as a villain, but I only give credit to the concept, not the
actual performance. Also, as with "Batman Forever", the film looks great. It
looks like every penny of the budget was spent on the look of the film. The
set design, costumes, and special effects are all top-notch.
I'm all for a silly summer movie. Sometimes I like shutting down most of my
brain and just enjoying a fun movie. But to consider "Batman and Robin" to
be fun, you'd have to completely tear your brain out of your head and throw
it away, never to be used again. Please someone stop Joel Schumacher before
he vomits into a film cannister again and tries to pass it off as a movie.
[PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     If a producer had ever been foolish enough to give Ed Wood
(director of arguably the worst movie ever made, PLAN 9 FROM OUTER
SPACE) a hundred million dollars, the result could well have been this
BATMAN & ROBIN.
     In summer Hollywood studios usually figure that big budget action
pictures will sell regardless of quality.  But even with diminished
expectations, BATMAN & ROBIN is surprisingly bad.  It insults the
viewer's intelligence with lifeless acting and a tired script.  In our
packed advanced screening, there was excitement in the air before the
film started.  But after the lights went down, the audience stared in
almost silent disbelief at a film that was so DOA.
     The third Batman movie, BATMAN FOREVER, which felt like it went on
forever, had the misfortune to have been directed by Joel Schumacher.
Schumacher appears to turn control of his action pictures over to the
special effects department, and he takes an MTV rock video approach to
the filmmaking.  The fourth in the Batman series, BATMAN & ROBIN, again
has Schumacher as the director. This time he manages to badly miscast
the roles of Batman and Robin and then coach Arnold Schwarzenegger into
giving the worst performance of his career.
     From the film's opening line of "The Iceman Cometh," by
Schwarzenegger as Victor Fries/Mr. Freeze, the dialog itself is frozen.
The show features bad acting masquerading as camp.  Mr. Freeze's lines
are spoken staccato style, and all of the cast speaks without
intonation.  Less like acting than the reading aloud one would expect
from a second grader.
     The sets by Barbara Ling and the costumes by Ingrid Ferrin, Bob
Ringwood, and Robert Turturice are quite colorful.  There are the
primary colors of the save-the-rain-forest benefit as well as scenes of
blue gray ice.  Savor these elements of the picture for they are all
that is worthwhile.  Had I not been there to review the film I would
have walked out after five minutes, literally.  It is that bad.
     If you think George Clooney is an unlikely and unpromising choice
for Batman, you are right.  Whereas Michael Keaton was quirky and Val
Kilmer was outlandish and brooding, Clooney gives such an
inconsequential performance as Bruce Wayne/Batman that he blends into
the background.
     Chris O'Donnell suffers the same problem.  As Dick Grayson/Robin,
it is easy to forget he is even on the set.
     The other leads, Uma Thurman as Pamela Isley/Poison Ivy and Alicia
Silverstone as Barbara Wilson/Batgirl, had promise, but again,
Schumacher manages to modulate their work and quickly to get to the
repetitive stunts.  Akiva Goldsman's script gives the two women the
same throwaway lines as the rest of the cast.  ("Come with me," teases
Poison Ivy to Robin.  "My garden needs tending.")
     As I sat frozen as if by Mr. Freeze's big gun, I whiled away the
time suffering through BATMAN & ROBIN wondering if there was any movie
I enjoyed less this year.  Although I could not recall all 137 movies I
have seen this year, I could not think of any that were worse.
     "If I must suffer, humanity will suffer with me," warns Mr.
Freeze.  And so will BATMAN & ROBIN's audiences.
     BATMAN & ROBIN runs two long hours.  It is rated PG-13 for
cartoonish violence and sexual innuendoes.  The film would be fine for
kids around 8 or 9 and up, but I recommend seeing anything else.  In
comparison to BATMAN & ROBIN the summer's other action pictures look
like masterpieces.  If you do go, bring an interesting watch; you are
going to be looking at it frequently.  I thought about giving the film
no stars, but decided I would give it one half of a star for the sets.
Even so, I think I am being too generous.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Vince Yim
Director: Some guy who should be taken out and shot (Joel Schumacher)
Starring: A bunch of people who were handed a really horrible script and
were paid waaaay too much (Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris
O'Donnel, Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Jeep Swanson, Elle McPherson)
Written By: The hack who wrote the horrible script (Avika Goldsmith).
Based on the critically acclaimed "Batman: The Killing Joke" by Alan
Moore, the ultimate villain in the Batman gallery of rogues, The Joker
(played by Jack Nicholson), is on a crime rampage in an attempt to drive
Commissioner Gordon (played by Sam Elliot) to the brink of insanity.
Constantly terrorizing him, his acts culminate to invading the Gordon
household and brutally shooting Batgirl's alter ego, Barbara Gordon
(played by Alicia Silverstone), severing her spinal column and
effectively ending her career as a costumed crime fighter.  Batman
(played by Alec Baldwin) is on the case in an attempt to bring the
madman down by any means possible.
Oh...sorry, I must have lost my train of thought there.
In one of the worst comic book adaptations to date, director Joel
Schu-hack-her effectively destroyed the Batman film franchise, caused a
slump in sales of Batman comic books, and cost me $5 CDN.  The film is
so horrible, it made the direct-to-video Marvel films (The Punisher,
Captain America) look like genius by comparison.  The film is so
cheesily contrived, it made Howard the Duck look like Star Wars.  The
film's dialogue is so bad that it makes Jean Claude Van Damme's dialogue
look like it was written by Quentin Tarantino.
But enough venting.  Here is exactly what is wrong with this film.
1: The characters.  Tim Burton's Batman (1989) and Batman Returns (1991)
each featured a manageable three core characters (Batman, Joker, Vicky
Vale, and  Batman, Catwoman, Penguin, respectively).  Batman Forever
(1994) featured five (Batman, Robin, TwoFace, Riddler, Chase Meridian).
Batman and Robin featured the most (Batman, Robin, Batgirl, Mr. Freeze,
Poison Ivy, Bane, Generic Love Interest).  While some film franchises do
succesfully add characters (Lethal Weapon, for one), it is due to the
fact that the characters are familiar.  With all these characters
venting their excess baggage, it is impossible to get any feel for the
characters.  Which brings me to...
2: Faithfulness to the source medium.  Bane was supposed to be the most
deadly Batman villain of all, paralyzing Batman from the waist down and
temporarily ending his crime fighting career.  Instead of being Batman's
intellectual and physical superior, he is reduced to a monosyllabic
buffoon in the film, who's dialogue consists of "Bomb...bomb...bomb..."
(or, perhaps he was referring to the box office reciepts).  Batgirl was
supposed to be the daughter of Commissioner Gordon who originally wore
the costume for a Hallowe'en party.  Instead, she becomes Batgirl after
finding a CD-Rom with the Batman's secrets on it.  Don't even mention
the fact that Bane uses the "Super Soldier Serum" (does the name
"Captain America" ring a bell?).
3: Overall tone.  Apart from the characters, the film has absolutely
nothing to do with the current issues of Batman being put out.  Gone is
the dark, gothic tone of the comics, replaced by the gaudy colours of
the 1960's television show with Adam West.  Joel Shu-hack-her seems to
have failed to realize that comic books have since grown up, and so has
the audience.
4: Dialogue.  I had to bite my tongue to prevent myself from heckling
the dialogue (ie: Bruce Wayne says, "There are things about me you don't
know...", to which I respond, "HE'S GOT A THING FOR GERBILS!").  Instead
of intelligent speech, we are subjected to stupid one-liners.  "Let's
kick some ice!"  "Chill..."  "Kill the heroes!"  "It's the hockey team
from hell!"  A comic book written by Rob Liefeld (the much maligned
artist and writer, formerly of Image comics) has smarter dialogue than
that.
5: Action sequences.  Schwarzenegger and Clooney were given thirty pound
costumes that severely restricted their movement and made fight scenes
virtually impossible.  So, in lieu of real fight choreography, the
audience is given quick editing to give the illusion of a fast and
furious fist fight.  NOT.  Choppy editing is no substitute for real
fight choreography.
6: "Humor".  Batman flashes a credit card and says, "Gotham Express,
don't leave home without it."  Robin repeats a line from the previous
film, "Chicks dig the car, right?"  Mr. Freeze gives Batman a cure for a
disease and says, "Take two and call me in the morning."  Batgirl finds
out all of Batman's secrets, to which Robin comments, "I guess we're
going to have to kill her."  This was intended as humorous, I merely
groaned.  Loudly.  The only time I really laughed was when Dr. Fries (by
Arnold Schwarzenegger) falls off a ledge into a vat of chemicals and
screams on the way down.  Unfortunately, I don't think that was intended
7: Marketability over substance.  Sure enough, the film cost over $100M
to make, much of which was used to pay the big named actors'
astronomical salaries.  It's got a hot new soundtrack with tunes by
Smashing Pumpkins.  It's got a bunch of t-shirts to be made from it.
But with that much money, they could have made a much better film.
8: The gratuitous crotch, ass, and breast shots.  There are two
completely unnecessary sequences where Batman and Robin (at the
beginning) and Batgirl (near the end) are getting into costume.  The
camera focuses on butts, crotches, and breasts, successfully causing me
to STOP enjoying the film.  As soon as I saw Chris O'Donnel and George
Clooney's vinyl covered asses on sceen, I felt the sudden impulse to run
screaming from the theatre.  Unfortunately, I would have had no way of
getting home if I did (I was with friends at the time).
Surely enough, I'm not the only one who felt this way, as poor reviews
and word of mouth promptly sunk this film's grosses, causing it to
barely recoup its budget and marketing costs, and causing Warner
Brothers to consider dumping the franchise, as well as the Superman
franchise.
Later on, Joel Schumacher would go on to blame the film's lackluster
success on the "unpoliced internet" and on the die hard comic book fans
who didn't embrace the lack of faithfulness to the original source
medium.  George Clooney would later blame himself for the film's demise
at the box office and the destruction of the Bat-Franchise.  Judging on
who the two lead players of the film choose to lay blame, the one who
the audience can lay blame on is obvious.
--

Author
Bill Chambers
A month ago I wrote that Speed 2 was the worst film I've ever reviewed
on paper. I didn't know at the time that I'd soon encounter and
despise Batman & Robin, which has just overtaken Speed 2 as the
picture least worthy of your attention this summer. As directed by
Joel Schumacher (who now specializes in Batman sequels and John
Grisham adaptations and isn't very good at either), B & R is one long
excuse for a Taco Bell promotion. The plot, which has Mr. Freeze and
Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman) planning to take over Gotham City and then
"the vorld" (as an oddly ineffective Schwarzenegger states), is
weighted down by repetitive asides about the nature of trust,
partnership, blah, blah, blah. But morals are not the point of this
film--topping each bloated, confusing action scene with next one
is. The garish art direction and overlit cinematography make this
picture oddly comparable to the trashy Showgirls. Since when did
Gotham City become a giant Las Vegas hotel? Only George Clooney comes
out on top; he underplays nicely and pretends like he's in a real
movie. * (out of four)

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Someone decided it was time for another Batman film.  Note that
this is not the same thing as saying that somebody had a good idea for
a Batman story that they wanted to film.  I did not say that someone
was really excited about the possibilities for the Batman character and
the peripheral people in Batman's life.  But time has definitely passed
and the cash cow was ready for another squeeze.  Batman (George
Clooney) and Robin (Chris O'Donnell) battle Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger) a villain who wants to freeze the world and Poison Ivy
(Uma Thurman) who can make people love her, has a poison kiss, and
wants to make the world safe for plants.  Batman's butler Alfred
(Michael Gough) is dying.  Batman and Robin have a falling out over
Ivy.  Alfred's British niece (Alicia Silverstone) becomes Batgirl.  And
this plot is just one minor feature of the new BATMAN AND ROBIN!  If I
seem not to consider the plot very important, you should see the
treatment it gets from director Joel Schumacher.  The script was not
ready to film and Schumacher should have rejected it.  Clearly there
are better things to do with the villains than to have them call the
title characters "Batface and Birdbrain."  Ivy was turned into a
monster by being buried with some poisons for a few minutes.  She comes
back to life and immediately says various parts of her have been
replaced by chemicals and her lips are now poison.  How would she know?
One sparkling line in the film has a scientist claiming to have drilled
"three concentric circles" into somebody's skull.
     Top-billed as Mr. Freeze is Arnold Schwarzenegger, who may be able
to bench press a Buick but finds it beyond his ability to push a
performance out through thick layers of blue makeup and plastic suit.
The concept of a villain who fell into a freezing vat and now wants to
freeze the world left me cold, and Schwarzenegger's performance is an
absolute zero with none of his natural wit and far too many lamely
unfunny one-liners.  Physically, George Clooney looks the most like the
comic book Bruce Wayne of the three actors who have played him so far,
or put another way, this is the first one who looked at all the part.
The problem is that Clooney is not a very exciting or even interesting
actor.  And if you cannot be exciting as Batman, you may just not be
destined to be exciting at all.  Chris O'Donnell plays Robin, the Boy
Wonder who in my days of reading the comic was eternally about fourteen
years old.  Unfortunately it is hard to find a fourteen-year-old with
marquee value.  Putting O'Donnell in the role becomes an increasingly
silly piece of casting each time he shows up.  This leaves the BATMAN
AND ROBIN wide open to be stolen by the fourth-billed Uma Thurman.  Uma
Thurman!  How bad do three actors have to be for a decorative but dull
Uma Thurman to turn in the most interesting performance?  Next comes
Alicia Silverstone as Barbara Wilson, soon to be Batgirl.  Silverstone
is a cute blonde who gets most of her personality by making funny
expressions with her mouth: biting her lower lip, pouting, so forth.
The script apparently calls for her to be British, but she made no
attempt to sound British and nobody cared.  Michael Gough, who has been
in ALL FOUR Batman films turns in the most touching performance and may
well be the best actor in the film.
     With each new Batman film Gotham City becomes more deeply engulfed
by the inevitable and all-consuming advance of Art Nouveau.  The art
style appears to be chewing up all the more normal-looking buildings
and spitting out titanic geometric formations and baroque reliefs and
statues of colossal human figures.  Gotham seems unable to stem the
tide, but apparently Batman has not been called.  The city has gone
from resembling Helsinki in the first film to being an incredible
architectural nightmare in BATMAN AND ROBIN.  Perhaps the one saving
grace of the film is that it does bring this abstract art-form to the
masses.  But this combines with Stephen Goldblatt's dark photography
and Dennis Virkler's fast editing.  The result is a film that might be
entertaining to look at if it were just a little more sparse and if the
pace were cut down just a bit.  But there were many scenes in which I
had to ask myself what it was that I just saw.

Author
Michael Dequina
Batman and Robin (PG-13) * 1/2 (out of ****)
Holy Bat-astrophe!  The Batman film franchise as we know it is dead,
thanks to Batman and Robin, director Joel Schumacher and screenwriter Akiva
Goldsman's campy and most disrespectfully lighthearted reinterpretation of
Bob Kane's Dark Knight.
To most clearly and thoroughly address all that is wrong with this
Bat-flick, I will first review the film character by character:
Bruce Wayne/Batman (George Clooney):  Clooney has gone on record
that his aim in taking on the role of Batman was to wipe off the scowl from
under the cowl and lighten up the Caped Crusader.  Big mistake.  What seems
to be lost on Clooney, Schumacher, and Goldsman is that angst and brooding
is what makes Batman Batman--strip away that and you have in effect stripped
away the meat of the character, not to mention the whole motivation behind
millionaire Bruce's nocturnal adventures in a rubber rodent suit.  So what
Clooney serves up is a not-too-interesting guy with a grin perpetually glued
onto his face, a flat, distant character we have absolutely no insight into
whatsoever.
Dick Grayson/Robin (Chris O'Donnell): I am not a Robin fan; I never
have been, and I probably never will.  However, despite a shaky, whiny
beginning, O'Donnell made me tolerate the Boy Wonder by the end of
Batman Forever by simply calming down.  In Batman and Robin, though, Dick
and Robin are back in ultrawhiny mode, playing up the petty jealousy and
brash youth and naivete which are the very characteristics which annoy
Robin-haters the most.  Presumably, the audience is supposed to sympathize
with Dick/Robin's frustration with not being treated as an adult by
Bruce/Batman, but based on his behavior in the film, there is no reason for
Bruce/Batman to treat Dick/Robin as anything but the whiny kid he comes off as.
Barbara Wilson/Batgirl (Alicia Silverstone): The big problem with
Batgirl is that no one figured out how to fit her into the story.  Unlike
the introduction of Dick/Robin in Forever, which tied directly into the
storyline with Two-Face, Barbara, Alfred's (Michael Gough) niece, simply
turns up on the Wayne Manor doorstep in act one and, in a most superfluous
subplot, is revealed a closet biker chick in act two.  There is an attempt
at convergence in act three, when Barbara becomes Batgirl (though her
ear-less getup makes her more resemble Robingirl) and aids the dynamic duo
in their cause, but her most significant contribution is pulling an Ariana
Richards in Jurassic Park (that is,
hack into a computer).  The zaftig Silverstone is a good enough sport, but
she never appears completely comfortable as either biker Barbara or brainy
Barbara (or, for that matter, in her rubber costume).
Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger): The filmmakers seem the most
confused with how do deal with Dr. Victor Fries.  Schumacher and Goldsman
use the tragic origin for the character from Batman: The Animated
Series--Dr. Fries experimented with cryogenics in an effort to save his
terminally ill wife, Nora (played by supermodel Vendela), but a lab mishap
made him unable to survive in non-freezing temperatures.  Instead of leaving
it at that, in an apparent concession to the casting of Schwarzenegger in
the role, Mr. Freeze is a wisecracker, which is totally at odds with the
tragic depiction that is also presented.  What results is a most jarring
mess of a character.  Case in point: one early scene shows a somber Freeze
wistfully watching old home movies of him
and his wife.  Suddenly, an underling comes in and interrupts his viewing
with some important news.  Freeze turns around in his chair, freezes the guy
with his freezing gun, and quips, "I hate it when people talk during the
movie."  Just what exactly are Schumacher and company going after here?
Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman): The one character that is the slightest bit
done right is that of seductive eco-terrorist Pamela Isley--but it's more
due to Thurman's lively performance than anything done by the filmmakers.
Like Michelle Pfeiffer as Catwoman in Batman Returns (though not nearly as
good), Thurman has a firm grasp on the key to her character: she's not a
vamp, she's a natural wallflower acting like a vamp--thus the act is that
much more extreme.  Thurman pulls it off beautifully, but, in the end, even
she's not immune to Schumacher and Goldsman's camp.  For a gifted scientist,
her master plan--to populate the world with toothed, tongued plants that
come straight out of Little
Shop of Horrors--is idiotic.
Bane (Jeep Swenson): Idiotic doesn't quite cover what is done to the
character of Bane, who definitely is the most ruined character in this film
treatment.  In the Batman comics, Bane is Batman's ultimate challenge--not
only is he physically stronger than Bruce Wayne, he is also smarter.  The
problem is that the venom which coarses through his veins makes him crazy.
In Batman and Robin, the only thing left of Bane comic fans know and love is
his bulk and the venom.  Bane is nothing more than a generic, grunting,
intelligence-impaired, muscled henchman to Poison Ivy.  The saddest thing
about the raping of Bane, he being a rather recent addition to the Batman
comic universe, is that most
mainstream moviegoers won't even know that anything has been done wrong.
Schumacher and Goldsman's wrongdoing do not end with the characters.
Their most heinous crime is the overwhelming atmosphere of camp, from Batman
pulling out a Bat-credit card during an auction to Mr. Freeze's bunny
slippers, polar bear pajamas, and freezer full of frozen dinners.
Schumacher has said that he wanted to "put some 'comic' back in comic book,"
but he forgets what comic book he's dealing with--Batman, which is a "comic"
book in name only.  In camping everything up, Schumacher, who claims to be a
comic book fan, just reinforces the most widely held stereotype about
comics--that they're just for kids.  The irony is, of course, that the film
Batman and Robin is more juvenile than any Batman comic you'd find on the
stands today.
I can go on about what is wrong with Batman and Robin, but I must give
some credit where credit is due.  B&R does boast the most impressive visual
effects of the series; effects supervisor John Dykstra (of the recently
closed Warner Bros. effects house) comes up with some very convincing for
Freeze's freezing weapons and Ivy's pheremone dust.  Production designer
Barbara Ling provides another striking vision of Gotham, with its towering
buildings and statues.  And, yes, I guess I can say something "positive"
about Schumacher's work--he's an equal opportunity exploiter.  Not only are
we treated to a Batman and Robin suiting-up sequence filled with butt,
crotch, and chest shots, their female counterpart is similarly exploited
when she gets her chance to suit up.
The most telling indication of Batman & Robin's shoddiness is the
audience reaction at the screening I attended.  When the lights dimmed and
the curtain rose, the crowd cheered, and it applauded the names of the five
main stars.   When the film ended with the image of Batman, Robin, and
Batgirl running in front of the Batsignal, there was a smattering of tepid
applause, but mostly boos.  Let the Bat-lash begin.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
Terri Buchman
BATMAN AND ROBIN: ahm, well, that was something.  I'm not quite sure what,
but that was something.  I'm not sorry that I went, but I'm not sure I'd go
again.  It had terrible, horrible, teeth-grindingly bad dialogue that made
me want to slap not only the credited screenwriter, Akiva Goldsman, but
every Elementary school teacher who ever told him he could write.  (What
could they have been thinking?)  On the other hand, there were some solidly
gorgeous visuals in the flick, the costuming was a hoot and Uma Thurman
ain't half bad as Poison Ivy. So, I'd say flip a coin.  Heads, the visuals
win and you get to spend two+ hours in air conditioning.  Tails, the dopey
plot is just too difficult to take.
This is one loud damn picture.  (Which is actually sort of a mixed
blessing, since some of the idiotic dialogue is acutally drowned out.  Just
thank the Divine for small miracles and pass the popcorn.)  I'm not exactly
sure of the specific plot sequence, but it doesn't really matter.  Batman
and Robin get another couple of psychotic bad guys to fight, one armor-clad
uber-male and one barely clad uber-female.  The Caped Crusader has also
been very busy in the old Bat-metalshop and has come up with a host of new
bat toys that I almost actually saw.  (It was a somewhat dimly lit picture.
Why Warner Bros would spend mega-bucks developing all these cool toys and
then forget to light the set so that the audiience can acutally see them is
beyond me, but there it is.)
Let's see, what else do I remember.?  (It was that kind of a picture.  You
have trouble recalling what the heck was in it ten minutes after you leave
the theater.)   Well, Chris O'Donnell was in it.  This was actually a
highlight of the movie for me, since my 12 year old daughter has a huge
crush on Mr. O'Donnell and sighed heavily every time he came on screen.
(You haven't lived until you've been to an action picture with a love-sick
preteen.  I knew parenthood would be tough, but I never thought I would
have to warn my daughter about getting involved with guys who have obvious
rubber fetishes.  On the other hand, it made the picture more interesting.)
I really, really like George Clooney.  He has a nice screen presence.
Unfortunately (And it kills me to say this, because I really like Mr.
Clooney) his Batman is not really very good.  (No wonder my daughter has a
crush on Mr. O'Donnell instead of Mr. Clooney.  Mr. O'Donnell has a pulse
and his Robin is a bit of a rebel.  He's very cute.  Mr. Clooney's Batman
acts like the dorm mother in a large frat house.  "No, you can't get your
own car until you've proved you can handle it.  No I will not loan you
money.  You have lousy taste in women.  Would you stop whining all the time
and act your age."  Geez, if I were Robin I'd leave Wayne Manor and set up
shop somewhere else.  Batman is getting a little stodgy and difficult to be
around.
Alicia Silverstone plays Batgirl.  Yawn.
Okay, everybody loves the Bat-Villains.  (Well, sorta.  I loved Catwoman in
the second Bat movie, but I hated the Penguin.  I loved Nicholson's Joker
and Carrey's Riddler.  I tolerated Tommy Lee Jones' Two-Face.  That's not a
bad villain track-record.)  Ahnold is ahm, well Ahnold.  This poor, poor
man is saddled with some of the worst puns and lamest, dumbest dialogue
I've ever heard.  (See .sig below.  I've seen a lot of dumb dialogue and I
am, generally speaking, a forgiving woman, but even I have a limit.)  It's
as though someone took all the dalogue from past Ahnold movies and put them
in a Cuisinart and then gave him the finished product.  The character's
costume is fun (RoboCop Lite) and Ahnold certainly seems to be having fun
with the part.  But the character doesn't really take off and start doing
this joyful dance of psychotic rebellion that the best Bat-Villains do.
The character is weighted down by an indecisive plot that can't decide
whether Mr. Freez is a deluded and sad character or a silly upbeat
homicidal freak.  I still can't figure it out.  (Geez, they stole the
characterization from one of the best episodes of 'Batman: The Animated
Series.'  The least they could have done was run with it.  Victor Freez,
sad and pathetic character who was, in a way, a victim of love.)  Ahnold
ain't a victim of anything and his Mr. Freez is an anti-climax.
Uma Thurman is wonderful as Poison Ivy.  Batman has a long tradition of
infatuation with the wrong woman and Ivy is a truly messed-up Bat-Babe.
Thurman is lively and beautiful and graceful and underclad as the luscious
and vengeful Poison Ivy.  She is the highlight of the movie.  (Well, I also
have a soft spot for Michael Gough who has been Alfred the Butler through
all 4 installments of this series.  He has surely endured a lot.)  Ms.
Thurman's performance isn't as rich as Michele Pfeiffer's was in BATMAN
RETURNS, but she is a strong and funny character and is almost worth the
price of admission.
Gotham City is wonderfully, breathtakingly brought to life.  (Damn.
Writing this makes me think of that line of dialogue from BULL DURHAM.  To
paraphrase:  This picture has a multi-million dollar art design, but a ten
cent brain.  Too bad.)  Particular highlights include shots of all those
wacky giant sculptures and a gorgeous and fully imagined shot of Arkham
Asylum.  (Could someone please tell MR. Schumacher that in the next picture
we would like to see some of the stunning visuals put to good use.  Hey,
maybe we could break a few wackos out of Arkham, let them use their brains
and give Bats a real challenge.  That might be fun.)
Anyway, I can neither recommend nor discourage anyone from going to see
BATMAN & ROBIN.  It depends on how you like your action flicks.  If you
like bright, loud, splashy popcorn movies and don't mind bad dialgoue and
extremely fuzzy plotting, then go, have fun.  (Hey, if you happen to like
lots of shots of black-rubber clad toushies, then this is the picture for
you.)  If you want movies to make sense and you want a picture that slows
down for five minutes so that you can actually find out what the heck is
going on, then pick something else.
I really liked some of it.  Honest-to-gawd.  But then again, I really,
really hated parts of it.  Go figure.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     A colorfully clunky costumed romp, BATMAN AND ROBIN is the most
lighthearted of the Batflicks.  Though not nearly the camp classic that
director Joel Schumacher (A TIME TO KILL, BATMAN FOREVER) obviously
intended, the movie that Frank Miller fans love to hate delivers many a
hearty Batlaugh, from the first scene's fetishistic close-ups (butt,
codpiece, etc.) to Uma Thurman's wonderfully punny innuendo.  (Address-
ing Arnold Schwarzenegger's diamond-stealing Mr. Freeze, her Poison Ivy
purrs "I'll help you grab your rocks.") Subtle in ain't, but at least
the tone (or lack thereof) is consistent from the beginning.  (If, say,
Schwarz's chilling puns don't warm your blood, you'll know to make
tracks.) And, while said villains once again steal the show, we actually
get to spend a little quiet time around Stately Wayne Manor.  (Subplots
include a bratty Boy Wonder, an illness for Alfred, and the arrival of
Barbara Wilson, Mr. Pennyworth's niece, a student at Oxbridge By The
Beach.)
     Of the primary players, Chris O'Donnell is, again, the most
engaging.  George Clooney certainly *looks* good as Bruce Wayne, but,
well, he smiles too much.  (Even during death scenes!) And he keeps
nodding, for some reason.  (All that rooftop-induced vertigo, I guess.)
Alicia Silverstone doesn't add much to the movie as Batgirl, but, hey,
she looks good in a costume!  (No nipples on the Batboobs, though.
Sigh.) Uma's Ivy is absolutely fabulous, despite a weak origin sequence.
Arnie is also in on the joke, though his huge costume seems to stiffen
his line-readings.  (He's much more fun at home, at his ice lair, wear-
ing his fuzzy polar bear slippers.) On the supporting front, both
Michael Gough and Pat Hingle have returned for a fourth go-around, as
Alfred and Commissioner "Don't Ask Why I'm Dressed Like Chief O'Hara"
Gordon.  Also packaged among the action figures:  a wildly coifed John
Glover (as Dr.  Jason Woodrue, evil scientist), a masked and body-
painted Jeep Swanson (as Bane, bane of all Batfans), and a trio of
supermodels, Elle Macpherson, Vivica Fox, and Vendela K. Thommesen, as
assorted dolls, molls, and frozen wives.
     The big surprise-- well, other than the distressing realization
that yet a *third* actor can wear the rubber suit and not make much of a
difference-- is the surplus of action, surely a first for the franchise.
Neither of the title characters does much detective work in this movie,
but they do have a high time playing hockey and racing their vehicles
down the arms of giant statues and escaping airborne rocket ships
without the use of parachutes.  Or oxygen masks.  (And you thought the
Batmobile driving up the side of a building was a stretch!) Other
treats:  O'Donnell and Clooney's casual chemistry, a playful assortment
of in-jokes and self-references, and the most accomplished art direction
of the Batseries.  Finally, we experience Gotham City from enough
angles, heights, and perspectives to appreciate the visions inspired by
Anton Furst (BATMAN) and Bo Welch (BATMAN RETURNS), and, now, fully
realized by production designer Barbara Ling.
     Like all the Batfeatures before it, the film's great failing is in
the editing.  The pacing is horrid.  The action sequences are often
confusing.  Character introductions are abrupt.  Prickly plot points are
ignored.  (For the nit-picker, though, it's pure gold.  How did they
know to bring ice skates?  Where does Batman have his credit card bill
sent?  Why is a computer-science major reduced to guessing passwords,
and on a computer that actually displays the characters as she types
them?  Holy Hollywood!) BATMAN AND ROBIN badly needs another trip (or
two) through the editing booth.  And, given that Schumacher has re-
portedly recut BATMAN FOREVER, for an as-of-yet unreleased DVD release,
there may be hope for the camped crusaders yet.  There's a decent movie
in here, arguably the most audience-friendly of the franchise.  It just
needs a few more passes with the Batscissors.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        I'm as big a fan of the Batman franchise as any, but I think 
it's time for a mercy killing. BATMAN & ROBIN is easily the worst 
of the four recent BATMAN films. It's about on the level of the 1966 
BATMAN movie; and that's no compliment. The '60s Batman was 
taken as an abomination of comic book purity, but it was at least 
funny and well-written at times. Akiva Goldsman's script for 
BATMAN & ROBIN would probably earn him a D+ in a ninth grade 
creative writing class.
        The dialogue is a long string of horrible puns and cliches, 
and the serious parts are even worse. The core of a good movie is 
good writing, and rotten writing lies at the heart of a bad movie. The 
art direction here is about the same as BATMAN FOREVER, even 
using the same black light costuming and computer-generated 
swooping graphics of Gotham City. The movie looks great but still 
sucks because core is crap. You can dress a turd up in a nice little 
baby bonnet, but it's still a turd.
        Nothing remains the same from movie to movie in the 
BATMAN films. Different costumes, different villians, different 
Batmobile, even a different Batman. In one of those casting 
decisions I'll never understand, they picked George "ER" Clooney 
for BATMAN & ROBIN. He was passable in FROM DUSK TILL 
DAWN, but he does nothing here to distinguish himself as Batman. 
He's neither good nor bad nor memorable, but then again, it doesn't 
really matter who's under the mask as long as it's a slim, dark-haired 
white guy. It could be Howard Stern or John Bon Jovi for all we 
care.
        It's always the villains that distinguish BATMAN films, 
from Jack Nicholson's Joker to Michelle Pfeiffer's Catwoman. 
Casting Arnold Schwarzenegger as Mr. Freeze seemed like a good 
idea until I actually saw him in costume. Head shaved, painted silver 
from head to toe in foreboding Tron armor that glows in the dark. 
The bad writing is spread all around, but Freeze is the only 
character who delivers 100 percent rotten lines, from "The iceman 
cometh!" to "Forecast: cool!" They make comic book dialogue 
balloons seem like they were written by Hemingway.
        The rest of the cast is more or less adequate, although we 
can never get over the garbage that's coming out of their mouths. 
Returning actors Chris O'Donnell as Robin, Michael Gough as 
Alfred and Pat Hingle as Commissioner Gordon all step right back 
into the roles they've filled before, and cameo players with five or 10 
lines each, like Elle MacPherson as Bruce Wayne's steady girlfriend 
and Vivica A. Fox as Freeze's lusty henchwoman (FOX: I'm hot for 
you. FREEZE: I'm cold for you.) liven things up a little.
        Then there are the two leading babes -- Uma Thurman and 
Alicia Silverstone. Thurman plays comic book creation Poison Ivy, a 
character irresistable to men who is similar to Carolyn "Morticia" 
Jones as Marsha, Queen of Diamonds in the "Batman" TV show. 
She's beguiling as always, even with green plant eyebrows, but her 
character is written as a retread of Catwoman in BATMAN 
RETURNS. Both had origins as hard workers who stumbled upon 
their evil bosses' secrets and then the bosses tried to kill them. 
Catwoman was brought back by cats, now Poison Ivy is revived by 
nature itself.
        Silverstone, who already seems past her prime, is Batgirl, 
whose origin is a retread of Robin's. Like O'Donnell in the last 
movie, she comes to stay at Wayne Manor after her parents are 
killed (I don't think people are allowed into Wayne Manor unless 
their parents are dead), stumbles upon Wayne's secret and decides 
she wants to fight crime too. There's even a repeat of the scene 
where Robin goes out by himself to battle a gang of neon thugs, 
then ends up being bailed by Batman. Here, it's Batgirl who does the 
fighting and Robin who does the bailing.
        Just about everything in BATMAN & ROBIN borrows from 
past films. Mr. Freeze's origin story is similar to Two-Face's. Both 
did good for their fellow man -- Freeze as a scientist trying to find 
the cure for his wife's disease (This is the second time in three years 
Schwarzenegger has been uncredible as a scientist.) and Face as a 
district attorney -- and went awry after an on-the-job accident. 
Freeze falls into a vat of freezing solution and somehow survives, 
although his appearance is greatly altered. In that respect, he might 
as well be the Joker.
        The two villains eventually pair up, just like Penguin and 
Catwoman in BATMAN RETURNS and Riddler and Two-Face in 
BATMAN FOREVER. Villains in Gotham City have to pair up 
sooner or later, and this time there's a third super-villain. It's Poison 
Ivy's henchman Bane, a grunting bohemoth who is created out of 
some kind of super plant solution. In the comic book, Bane was the 
ultra-intelligent villain who put Bruce Wayne out of commission; 
here, he's dumbed down to make Schwarzenegger's character seem 
like his IQ is above 100.
        The plot is pretty shoestring here. Freeze wants to freeze 
the city; Poison Ivy wants to kill Batman and Robin. There's not 
much else to it -- a fourth of the movie is pure, convoluted action, 
another fourth is origin scenes, a third fourth is criminal activity and 
the last part is trouble in the Wayne household. Alfred's dying, and 
they draw it out as much as they possibly can, so that eventually we 
want to kill the old guy ourselves. Then there's Batman and Robin 
fighting amongst themselves over Poison Ivy and how Batman 
always has to be right. The height of this pathetic dramatic 
exchange is Robin's line, "I'm sick of the Batsignal, I want a 
Robin-signal!"
        BATMAN & ROBIN is on the elementary level as far as 
writing goes. Schumacher has taken the worst elements of 
surrealism and bad dialogue in BATMAN FOREVER and run with 
them. Nothing is the least bit believable anymore, from the opening 
stratosphere fight with Freeze on. There's a fifth BATMAN script 
finished, but if it has the name Akiva Goldsman on it, I doubt many 
people would tune in tomorrow. Same bad writing, same plot 
cliches.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Alex Fung
(Warner Bros. - 1997)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma
  Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough
Screenplay by Akiva Goldsman
Produced by Peter Macgregor-Scott
Directed by Joel Schumacher
Running time: 130 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
I had never thought that an entry in the modern incarnation
of the BATMAN feature film would approach this level of
campiness, but in many instances BATMAN AND ROBIN nears, and at
some point even exceeds this standard.  This is a
disasterously bad film, easily the worst in the series to
date, and fairly epitomizes a cinematic definition of the word
excessive - it's loud, garish, and obnoxious, with pointless,
gratuitous action sequences and set pieces which clutter up
the screen with elaborate production design to the point of
overkill. 
BATMAN AND ROBIN features the Caped Crusaders (George Clooney
debuting as Batman, with Chris O'Donnell returing as Robin)
squaring off against another bevy of chemically-induced
villains - the nefarious ice-cold Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger), armed with a weapon which freezes everything
in its sights, and the slinky Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), who
has the ability to blow powerful love dust into the faces of
men in order so that they will fall helplessly in love with
her (not that the dust is really necessary to accomplish this
result, but whatever), and then dispatch them with a poisoned
kiss.  By Ivy's side is the giant steroid monster Bane (Jeep
Swanson), a grunting hulk of a beast.  The villains' goals
are noble ones - Freeze steals diamonds to power his climate
suit (in order to keep his body temperature at zero degrees),
so that he can survive in order to devise a cure for his
beloved wife (Vendela), dying of a degenerative disease and
frozen in suspended animation, and Ivy's intent is to restore
the dominance of plant life on Earth, albeit by destroying all
human life.  Meanwhile, on the homefront, life at Wayne Manor
is thrown into upheaval by the illness of butler Alfred
Pennyworth (Michael Gough), and the arrival of his niece
Barbara (Alicia Silverstone). 
Akiva Goldsman's screenplay for the film is ridiculous and
laughably bad, with astonishingly terrible dialogue, lame
jokes, and an awful by-the-number plot which simply coasts
along and fails to generate any genuine excitement.  It makes
Goldsman's screenplay of BATMAN FOREVER, which I thought was
dreadful, look positively inspired in comparison. I am still
astonished that a cheesy plot device which I'd seen used in -
no joke - an episode of GILLIGAN'S ISLAND somehow make its
way into a multimillion dollar blockbuster production. 
Joel Schumacher's direction of BATMAN AND ROBIN is horrific,
with a terrible balance of flashiness over substance.  There
is a clear conceit towards neon in this film, even moreso
than with his previous BATMAN FOREVER, with the revamped
Batcave helpfully sporting gigantic glowing emblems for the
Dynamic Duo (just in case, I suppose, if they ever happen to
forget that the Batcave is the headquarters of Batman and
Robin), and with neon prominently figuring in an
utterly-pointless fight sequence with Bane and a street gang
over Ivy's chosen new abode.  Another action sequence which
fails to serve any useful point other than to chew up five
minutes of screentime involves an incredibly uninvolving
late-night motorcycle race with Barbara and some Gotham
goons.  Mr. Schumacher's focus for BATMAN AND ROBIN appears to
be to make the film as visually striking as possible, to the
detriment of the story - there are drastic shifts in the tone
of the film between all-out camp and heartfelt drama, with
the latter completely unconvincing and ineffective. 
It is perhaps not the most promising of signs when the group
I was with burst out laughing within twenty seconds of the
film's opening, even before a single line of dialogue had
been uttered.  Is BATMAN AND ROBIN supposed to be campy? I
think it is - it's hard to imagine that the filmmakers could
have intended many parts of the film to be taken at all
seriously.  (One of my favourites was when Bane helpfully
grunted "Bomb!" each time he laid down an explosive device in
the Gotham Observatory.)  Is it supposed to be as overly
campy as it turned out to be? I somehow doubt it - the
subplot involving Afred is delivered so solemnly and with
such graveness that the impression is made that the film
isn't attempting to be the utter farce which it is. 
Arnold Schwarzenegger is top-billed in the film as the
villainous Mr. Freeze, and is bland and uninteresting,
perhaps the worst thing that a villain can be.  Mr.
Schwarzenegger's attempts to be menacing are laughable, and
his attempts at conveying pathos are laughable; frankly,
everything he does onscreen is laughable.  By the end of the
film, I was stifling a chuckle every time he simply appeared
onscreen.  The bulk of his performance consists of uttering
near-unintelligble puns and one-liners featuring every
possible permutation of "Cool!" in the least inventive way. 
George Clooney has been given very little to do in BATMAN AND
ROBIN, being overshadowed by the villains, and consequently
he looks rather uncomfortable in the film.  His Batman is
hardly an imposing figure.  Chris O'Donnell is unimpressive
in a one-note performance, while Alicia Silverstone
lackadasically fails to make any impression at all. 
The film's one saving grace? Undoubtably Uma Thurman's
entertaining performance as sexy villainess Poison Ivy.  Her
work in BATMAN AND ROBIN is certainly over-the-top, but in a
controlled fashion which works splendidly within the tone of
the film.  Ms. Thurman's comic timing is impeccable, and
reminds us that it takes skilled performers to make campiness
work successfully.  (I'm already starting to positively
reassess Jim Carrey's performance in BATMAN FOREVER.)  Her
amusing Poison Ivy is the most entertaining character in the
film, and when she's offscreen the film greatly suffers.  I
figure that if one has to die, being kissed to death by Uma
Thurman isn't a half-bad way to go. 
While BATMAN AND ROBIN was hardly a ride of pulse-pounding
excitement, I must admit that I was not bored watching it,
although I did glance at my watch repeatedly through the
screening - my attention was kept through anticipation of the
utterance of yet another terrible pun or one-liner, and by
awaiting yet another scene to fall flat.  It's been a long
time since I've laughed so much at a movie.  "At", of course,
is the operative word. 

Author
Larry McGillicuddy
*** (out of 4)
Directed by Joel Schumacher
Starring George Clooney, Arnold Schwarzeneggar, Chris O'
Donnell, Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough
This 4th installment of the immensely popular movie
series is not as good as the original, but far better than
both of the sequels. It boasts great FX, good chemistry
between the leads, and two outstanding villains. I don;t
understand why people are proclaiming it to be so horrible.
I admit that it's not very intelligent, but it is more
visually impressive then the overrated 5th Element, and we
don't have to suffer through Chris Tucker's performance in
that movie.
The film gets started right away with an exciting opening
sequence (at last, no drawn out, lengthy introductions to
the villains) where Batman and Robin try to stop Mr. Freeze
from stealing a valuable diamond. Right off the bat (no pun
intended) Clooney shows he is a far more interesting Batman
than the dull, miscast Val Kilmer was. He's no Michael
Keaton, but he acquits himself nicely.
Later we learn that Mr. Freeze is a doctor who was trying to
revive his wife, and accidentally froze himself. There are
some great shots of Freeze looking sadly at his wife. Arnold
is an underrated actor, and he pulls these scenes off.
Uma Thurman is even better as Poison Ivy, a botanist who is
angry at the destruction humans cause to the earth. This is
keeping in with the Batman villain introduction, but it is
far less lengthy and annoying as The Penguin or Catwoman in
Batman Returns. Uma has a great deal of fun with the role,
and deliciously overplays every scene.
Once again, Gotham city is a wondrous creation. The visuals
are even better than in the other films, and many of the set
pieces are fun and exciting. The chemistry between Clooney
and O' Donnell is very impressive for two actors who have
never worked together before. Alicia Silverstone, as Batgirl
doesn't match up well to the other performers, but she
really isn't given much to work with, except for a fun fight
scene with Poison Ivy. People like Elle MacPherson and
Vivica A. Fox have roles so small, inconsequential, and dull
that they shouldve been left on the cutting room floor.
I'm not going to try and convince you Batman and Robin is a
great, or even good movie. But it's not nearly as bad as
most of my peers are making it out to be. It's a good piece
of eye candy; exciting, fun, and over before you realize how
dumb it is.

Author
Seth Bookey
Well, what everyone has had to say about this movie, and
about all the movies that have come before this one in the series, is all
true. The villains are more interesting than the heroes. Even the sets and
the costumes and the gadgetry are more interesting than the actors. But,
there is no stopping the moneymaking machine of the 1990s--the Batman
series.
Everything you need to know about the movie are easily
seen in the movie's subway posters--the heroes are Batman, Robin, and Batgirl,
and the villains are Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy. As in the other three installments
of this series, the villains are much more interesting than the heroes.
Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger, who gets top billing) is grieving for
his terminally ill and cryogenically preserved wife, who has some disease
he is trying to cure. Meanwhile, he is stealing diamonds to power the suit
that keeps him at a requisite freezing temperature, and that power his freezing
machines.
Across town, dowdy Dr. Pamela Isley falls into a pit of
botanical toxins and becomes Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), who uses pheromone
dust to entrance men and get them to fight over her. Both Thurman and Schwarzenegger
are entertaining, and are the main show, as far as I'm concerned. The characters
are written quite shallow, and spend far too much dialog on idiotic sexual
innuendo than anything else.
Meanwhile, at stately Wayne Manor, there is trouble. Bruce Wayne/Batman
(George Clooney) is having trouble getting ward Dick Grayson/Robin (Chris
O'Donnell) to reign in his teenage hormones and stop taking so many risks.
Faithful Butler Alfred (Michael Gough) is dying, and his niece Barbara
Wilson/Batgirl (Alicia Silverstone) has popped in for a visit by day, and
borrows motorcycles at night to go hellraising and drag racing. All of
this is basically a lot of noise signifying ...? Nothing. 
George Clooney is the third Batman and is supposed to be
a kinder, gentler Batman. Less brooding, but just as uninteresting as Michael
Keaton and Val Kilmer were in the title role. The movies are quickly approaching
the same level of silliness the television series displayed. (Viveca Fox
plays "Ms. B. Haven"--har har.) Again, the sets are marvelous
and moody and evoke silent screen classics like Fritz Lang's Metropolis.
But, after spending about $40 in eight years, enough is enough already.
This latest installment is just a lot of chase scenes set on a gargantuan
metropolitan set with outrageous villains and uninteresting heroes. Robin's
teen tantrums left me uninterested, and we don't see nearly enough of Alicia
Silverstone as Batgirl. Perhaps in the next chapter, which is supposed to
feature "The Joker's Wife" and actresses are lining up already
to win the role...

Copyright  1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Joel Schumacher
Writer: Akvia Goldsman
Starring: George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Uma 
Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, Elle MacPherson, 
John Glover, Vivica Fox, Coolio
The last line (or near to that honor) is the great butler, Alfred (the 
ubergod, Michael Gough) saying, "I think we need a bigger bat cave," or 
something to that note.  That's exactly what this film is - too big for 
its own good because it has too damn much.  Cut Batgirl out.  Cut one of 
the villains.  It's too much to handle in one dosage.  It's so much that 
characters get left behind.  Poor Elle gets a mere 3 scenes and a 
subplot which is introduced but never finished in any way, shape or 
form.  And Elle deserves better.
This is the fourth in the gigantic film series and the second from 
director Joel Schumacher.  It's also the fourth worst in the series (and 
second worst from Joel).  The series has been declining since its 
stunning debut, followed by the almost-as-stunning sequel and then the 
anti-climactic third one (first by Joel).  This one's not anti-climactic 
- I knew it was gonna suck.  It's up to Joel to make it fun though.  
"Batman Forever" was fun.  This is a big bore of over-produced action 
sequences and shallow characters.  I mean, this one bit.
I'm gonna put all the plot in one paragraph: Mr. Freeze (Ah-nold), who's 
wife was dying of some disease, has become the new big villain these 
days.  He's a huge ex-scientist who fell into some weird liquid (Hello? 
 Joker?) and now has a body temperature of a big fat zero and has a blue 
body.  Batman (George) and Robin (Chris) fight him a bit but find 
they're growing apart.  Meanwhile, another villain shows up, Poison Ivy 
(UMA!), who was a dorky scientist chick working on flowers in South 
America with a twistet scientist (John Glover) who kills her when she 
finds out he's used her research to develop an uberman, Bane, who is 
basically a man pumped with chemicals which probably killed any 
personality he ever had.  She emerges from her chemicals (don't ask 
'cause I can't tell ya) as a sexy woman (the real Uma) who's poison when 
or if you kiss her and has some aphrodiasiatic scent she blows at 
people.  She starts to tear away at the dynamic duo.  Meanwhile, 
Alfred's dying of the same disease Mr. Freeze's wife has (but in an 
earlier state than she), and his niece, Barbara (Alicia), comes all the 
way from Oxford without an English accent to get him away from the 
butler trade, but soon (well, not really soon, it takes her 2 hours) 
becomes Batgirl.  MEANWHILE, in an unfinished subplot, Bruce (Batman's 
alter-ego, if you forgot) has been dating the lovely Julie Madison (the 
even lovlier Elle MacPherson) who wants a commitment after a year but he 
says nothing.  End of her for all we know.  Mr. Freeze ultimately teams 
with Poison Ivy and they want to freeze the world and then take it over 
growing new plants as their population (Don't ask!!!).  The trio must 
team together "as family" to beat them.
There ya go.  Not the whole story but no big context clues.  Too much, 
right?  Right!  The films seems patched together of nice little ideas 
which would have made for a couple good sequels.  However, while Tim 
Burton nicely balanced the villain/Batman storyline (although not 
wonderfully), Joel seems to do almost nothing with Batman in this one.  
He gets some corny speeches, a couple clever lines and that's it.  Maybe 
some stunts.  For all this, I can't even comment on George Clooney as 
Batman - I hardly saw the guy!  And when I did, he had horrible dialogue 
to say.  I think Michael Keaton is the quintessential Batman but Val 
Kilmer was too robotic and fake as Batman in the last episode.  George 
is in between them.  He's not quintessential, he's not horrible, he's 
good.  But I'm sure next time when they decide to renovate the series 
since they'll be critically murdered for this sorry effort, we'll get a 
good script and Clooney will shine (if he still has the job).
The villains are the only interesting part of the series according to 
Schumacher.  Last time, we had the brawn of Two Face as played by Tommy 
Lee Jones and the brains/comedy supplied by the Riddler as realized by 
Jim Carrey.  This time we have a somewhat sympathetic and somewhat 
hatable villain (the same guy), Mr. Freeze.  We feel bad for his 
mental/physical collapse but does he really need to kill everyone for 
plants?  Arnold isn't very good - too hokey but kinda sympathetic at 
some points.  When he watches old movies of his wife, he actually looks 
somber.  Wow.
But Uma makes the most of her seductive character, getting the right 
point between hamminess and seductiveness.  It's like she's almost 
parodying herself in "Pulp Fiction" at points.  She's incredibly hot and 
makes the movie pretty much a star better.
As for the lower Bat-people, Chris is the same as he was in "Batman 
Forever," although I think his work in these is too hokey when he's best 
at quieter parts in "Scent of a Woman" or just plain cool parts in 
"Fried Green Tomotoes."  Alicia - I love the girl but she's not 
particularly good in this film.  She can hypotheitically act, we all saw 
that in "Clueless," but her lines kinda sound weird.  And it isn't the 
mushy-mouth this time.  But in all fairness, she has virtually no part. 
 Joel gets around to her occasionally and when she's on, she does stupid 
stuff...although I know I'm not the only one who loved the catfight 
between her and Uma...
And poor Elle.  Poor, poor Elle.  I love that woman and she can also 
hypothetically act (for those of us who saw "Sirens").  But she has no 
part!!!  It seems like Joel had so much footage that he had to edit 
almost an hour out of the final product.  There are no "couch" scenes 
(like my best friend noticed).  Now listen to me on this one - in every 
"Batman" flick, there's a couch scene.  In the original, it was with 
Vicki.  In "Returns," it was a good make-out scene with Selena.  And in 
the last one, it was a chat with Nicole.  This one, it's nothing.  And 
Batgirl does next-to-nothing in this film till the end when she's 
suddenly "part of the family."
Fortunately, we get a lot of Alfred.  He's the always reliable butler, 
in case you didn't know, who has been with Bruce all his life.  He's a 
god.  He's a father figure.  He's also dying.  This got to me.  I love 
Alfred almost as much as Bruce and to see him in a robe, not in his tux, 
and freaking dying just gets to me.  We also get the idea that he might 
have been unhappy the whole time...but this is never answered, as this 
film is too cluttered.
But in defense, it does have some good parts, other than Uma.  For one, 
George IS a good Batman but unfortunately gets nothing to do.  And there 
are some nice touches.  When they show the asylum at one point, they 
show the patient's belongings in a room and we see the Riddler's 
costume.  I laughed.  And during a biker scene (involving Robin and 
Batgirl - another subplot never handled past initiation period), we not 
only see Coolio but a bunch of bad-asses dressed as "droogs" from "A 
Clockwork Orange."  I laughed at all these.
The film falls apart around the five-minute mark during an enormously 
long action sequence which must last around 20 minutes...or did it just 
feel like that?  The film should serve as another in the long-line of 
films which demonstrate that we need more intelligent films nowadays.  
People are fed up with stupid films.  That's why the word of mouth 
killed "The Lost World!"  That's why last year, indy films grossed more 
than ever.  That's why this will have a strong box-office initative from 
people who just want to see it, like me, but will die after a week or 
two when the word around the grapevine kills it.  That's why the next 
two big-budget aciton pics are John Woo's "Face/Off" and Barry 
Sonnenfeld's "Men in Black," both which are the first two to catch on to 
the wave early on.
I like Joel Schumacher more as a person than an artiste.  I like some of 
his films ("Flatliners," "A Time to Kill") but a lot of them suck.  He's 
a really eccentric person and I loved one of his quotes about how he 
admits to being a mediocre director and that's what makes him great.  
But his costuming for Woody Allen's "Sleeper" was more interesting than 
this one (and his costuming WAS cool - look for the nazi number).
I love the "Batman" series.  The first two rocked and I did like the 
last one.  But this one is not going to be one that I watch repeatedly 
like the other three.  Hopefully, this will also serve as a springboard 
to a better Batman next time.  And maybe they'll get smart and bring 
back Catwoman.  And Michael Keaton.  But we can only hope.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Arnold Schwarnegger, George Cloony, Chris O'Donnel, Uma
Thurman and Alicia Silverstone. Also starring Michael Gough as Alfred
Here's another summer blockbuster, which, although being a terrible
film, is bound to make a lot of money.  However, although there have
been many bad reviews about this film, I found it to be quite
enjoyable. Sure, the script is awful, and the one liners cringe worthy,
but I found it quite exciting. The action scenes are directed well by
Joel Schumacher, who seems quite content at pointing the camera at the
action, with the odd swooping camera shots. Clooney does a good Batman
(better than Val Kilmer, although he grins way too much) and Gough
plays the ill Alfred well. I was pleased that the story centered more
on Alfred, as he seemed to be generally ignored in the last three
films, with him just saying 'Good Luck' or helping out a bit.  The film
has it's bad points though. One of the major ones is that the bad guys
just aren't evil enough! They've softened Mr. Freeze (Arnold) so he
dosen't even really seem like a bad guy at the end of the film. Also,
Uma Thurman gives a good performance as Poison Ivy, but again, she's
not terrible evil. Also, the music surrounding her, to tell the
audience that she is 'sexy' is not necessary.  The only evil person in
the film was Ivy's sidekick, Bane, who was brilliant!
Overall then, although not a brilliantly written and acted film, I
found this film enjoyable.

Author
Jerry Saravia
The "Batman" movie series has approached the mentality of the campy Adam West
TV series of yesteryear: stupid and juvenile. "Batman and Robin" is a bad film;
wholly uneven and one-dimensional unlike the previous "Batman" films that
relied so much on character. This one has so many fight scenes and Dolby-ized
explosions and car wrecks that, at first, I thought I was watching an overblown
action flick a la Stallone.
The miscast George Clooney (TV's "E.R.") stars as the lighthearted, rather than
brooding, Batman who is more concerned with bedroom theatrics and the look of
his belt buckle and body armor than with catching the bad guys. Chris O'Donnell
reprises his role as "Bird Boy," excuse me, Robin, the bird-brained Bat partner
who is always horny. Poor Michael Gough returns as the dutiful servant of Wayne
Manor, Alfred, who is getting quite ill (after seeing the script, no doubt)
Then there's Alicia Silverstone (also miscast) as a schoolgirl who is Alfred's
niece and loves to ride around in motorbikes because of the danger principle
(?). She eventually dons a Bat suit and presto (!), she's Batgirl. Red alert to
all screenwriters: where's the transition? Somehow, the idea that Alfred
prepared a Bat suit for her because he was expecting her to enter the Bat cave
is hardly credible. 
Is there a story or a worthy plot in this movie? Answer: neither. There's a
plot thread which is left dangling longer than Batman does from the ceiling.
Arnold Schwarzeneger is Mr. Freeze, a Terminator-like villain who shoots every
innocent bystander with a freezing beam that turns them into ice sculptures.
Why is he doing this? Because he wants to save his cryogenically preserved wife
by finding a cure to a disease which the dying Alfred also suffers from. Got
it? And the villainess is Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), a sexy "Plant Girl" who has
venomous lips and chlorophyll for blood. "Don't kiss her!" utters Batman at one
point before Robin is lured into lip lock status. Poison Ivy wants Mother
Nature to begin plant life all over again and thus becomes partners with Mr.
Freeze who is ready to freeze Gotham City. Will Batman, Robin and Batgirl stop
them in time? Does anybody care anymore?
Joel Schumacher ("Batman Forever") helmed this travesty as well and it is a
considerable waste of celluloid. He shoots all the fight scenes in extremely
tight close-ups so it is hard to decipher what is happening sometimes. Some
action scenes do work, particularly the dazzling opening sequence, but how many
tight butt shots and shots below-the-belt can you stand? Holy sexual innuendos!
The characters are amazingly all underdeveloped. The duality of Batman and
Bruce Wayne is hardly represented anymore, and the script's idea of Bruce is to
have Clooney walk around in a black robe and smile incongruently. After a
while, I started to think that Batman and Bruce Wayne were not the same person!
Chris O'Donnell tries to act tough but appears more as a jealous, sexually
frustrated kid than a hero. Ditto Alicia Silverstone who is as clueless as
everyone else. Schwarzeneger seems to be having a good time but his one-liners
("The Iceman Cometh. Hell will freeze over. Just chill") get to be repetitive
after a while and do nothing to enhance the character - he's just a blue-eyed
hulk. Uma Thurman is marvelous in perhaps the best performance in the movie but
her Poison Ivy shtick (blowing kisses of purplish smoke) is thinly executed and
done with none of the relish that Michelle Pfeiffer had with Catwoman. And pity
Michael Gough who I hope will outlive this pointless franchise.
I am a big fan of the Batman series but this one is tired, unimaginative and
soulless. There's no excitement or spontaneity in the dusty Batcave anymore.
The music is loud enough to keep you awake, the explosions are delivered on
cue, and there's enough TV-style humor to make Adam West want to don his suit
again, but there's no sense of who Batman and Robin are or why they should be
considered heroes. As usual, the threadbare villains steal the show. One more
movie like this and the villains will become the heroes to root for. Maybe
that's not such a bad idea. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Author
Vince Yim
Review: Batman & Robin (1997)
Director: Some guy who should be taken out and shot (Joel Schumacher)
Starring: A bunch of people who were handed a really horrible script and
were paid waaaay too much (Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris
O'Donnel, Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Jeep Swanson, Elle McPherson)
Written By: The hack who wrote the horrible script (Avika Goldsmith).
Based on the critically acclaimed "Batman: The Killing Joke" by Alan
Moore, the ultimate villain in the Batman gallery of rogues, The Joker
(played by Jack Nicholson), is on a crime rampage in an attempt to drive
Commissioner Gordon (played by Sam Elliot) to the brink of insanity.
Constantly terrorizing him, his acts culminate to invading the Gordon
household and brutally shooting Batgirl's alter ego, Barbara Gordon
(played by Alicia Silverstone), severing her spinal column and
effectively ending her career as a costumed crime fighter.  Batman
(played by Alec Baldwin) is on the case in an attempt to bring the
madman down by any means possible.
Oh...sorry, I must have lost my train of thought there.
In one of the worst comic book adaptations to date, director Joel
Schu-hack-her effectively destroyed the Batman film franchise, caused a
slump in sales of Batman comic books, and cost me $5 CDN.  The film is
so horrible, it made the direct-to-video Marvel films (The Punisher,
Captain America) look like genius by comparison.  The film is so
cheesily contrived, it made Howard the Duck look like Star Wars.  The
film's dialogue is so bad that it makes Jean Claude Van Damme's dialogue
look like it was written by Quentin Tarantino.
But enough venting.  Here is exactly what is wrong with this film.
1: The characters.  Tim Burton's Batman (1989) and Batman Returns (1991)
each featured a manageable three core characters (Batman, Joker, Vicky
Vale, and  Batman, Catwoman, Penguin, respectively).  Batman Forever
(1994) featured five (Batman, Robin, TwoFace, Riddler, Chase Meridian).
Batman and Robin featured the most (Batman, Robin, Batgirl, Mr. Freeze,
Poison Ivy, Bane, Generic Love Interest).  While some film franchises do
succesfully add characters (Lethal Weapon, for one), it is due to the
fact that the characters are familiar.  With all these characters
venting their excess baggage, it is impossible to get any feel for the
characters.  Which brings me to...
2: Faithfulness to the source medium.  Bane was supposed to be the most
deadly Batman villain of all, paralyzing Batman from the waist down and
temporarily ending his crime fighting career.  Instead of being Batman's
intellectual and physical superior, he is reduced to a monosyllabic
buffoon in the film, who's dialogue consists of "Bomb...bomb...bomb..."
(or, perhaps he was referring to the box office reciepts).  Batgirl was
supposed to be the daughter of Commissioner Gordon who originally wore
the costume for a Hallowe'en party.  Instead, she becomes Batgirl after
finding a CD-Rom with the Batman's secrets on it.  Don't even mention
the fact that Bane uses the "Super Soldier Serum" (does the name
"Captain America" ring a bell?).
3: Overall tone.  Apart from the characters, the film has absolutely
nothing to do with the current issues of Batman being put out.  Gone is
the dark, gothic tone of the comics, replaced by the gaudy colours of
the 1960's television show with Adam West.  Joel Shu-hack-her seems to
have failed to realize that comic books have since grown up, and so has
the audience.
4: Dialogue.  I had to bite my tongue to prevent myself from heckling
the dialogue (ie: Bruce Wayne says, "There are things about me you don't
know...", to which I respond, "HE'S GOT A THING FOR GERBILS!").  Instead
of intelligent speech, we are subjected to stupid one-liners.  "Let's
kick some ice!"  "Chill..."  "Kill the heroes!"  "It's the hockey team
from hell!"  A comic book written by Rob Liefeld (the much maligned
artist and writer, formerly of Image comics) has smarter dialogue than
that.
5: Action sequences.  Schwarzenegger and Clooney were given thirty pound
costumes that severely restricted their movement and made fight scenes
virtually impossible.  So, in lieu of real fight choreography, the
audience is given quick editing to give the illusion of a fast and
furious fist fight.  NOT.  Choppy editing is no substitute for real
fight choreography.
6: "Humor".  Batman flashes a credit card and says, "Gotham Express,
don't leave home without it."  Robin repeats a line from the previous
film, "Chicks dig the car, right?"  Mr. Freeze gives Batman a cure for a
disease and says, "Take two and call me in the morning."  Batgirl finds
out all of Batman's secrets, to which Robin comments, "I guess we're
going to have to kill her."  This was intended as humorous, I merely
groaned.  Loudly.  The only time I really laughed was when Dr. Fries (by
Arnold Schwarzenegger) falls off a ledge into a vat of chemicals and
screams on the way down.  Unfortunately, I don't think that was intended
to be funny.
7: Marketability over substance.  Sure enough, the film cost over $100M
to make, much of which was used to pay the big named actors'
astronomical salaries.  It's got a hot new soundtrack with tunes by
Smashing Pumpkins.  It's got a bunch of t-shirts to be made from it.
But with that much money, they could have made a much better film.
8: The gratuitous crotch, ass, and breast shots.  There are two
completely unnecessary sequences where Batman and Robin (at the
beginning) and Batgirl (near the end) are getting into costume.  The
camera focuses on butts, crotches, and breasts, successfully causing me
to STOP enjoying the film.  As soon as I saw Chris O'Donnel and George
Clooney's vinyl covered asses on sceen, I felt the sudden impulse to run
screaming from the theatre.  Unfortunately, I would have had no way of
getting home if I did (I was with friends at the time).
Surely enough, I'm not the only one who felt this way, as poor reviews
and word of mouth promptly sunk this film's grosses, causing it to
barely recoup its budget and marketing costs, and causing Warner
Brothers to consider dumping the franchise, as well as the Superman
franchise.
Later on, Joel Schumacher would go on to blame the film's lackluster
success on the "unpoliced internet" and on the die hard comic book fans
who didn't embrace the lack of faithfulness to the original source
medium.  George Clooney would later blame himself for the film's demise
at the box office and the destruction of the Bat-Franchise.  Judging on
who the two lead players of the film choose to lay blame, the one who
the audience can lay blame on is obvious.
--

Author
skad13@my-deja.com
It took 'em three sequels, but they finally accomplished it: A $100
million Batman movie that's as cheesy as the old TV series. Audiences
have supposedly been begging for a lighter tone in these movies (though
you wouldn't guess it from the grosses). But when Batman and Robin shows
the duo skiing through the skies on makeshift surfboards, and you
actually hear the line "Today Gotham, tomorrow the world!", Adam West
starts to look downright Shakespearean.
Since a plot summary of a Batman movie would be superfluous at this
point, let's cover the main topics.
* Villains - The movie is 50-50 on this point. Arnold Schwarzenegger is
near-perfection as Mr. Freeze, but the movie's chief liability is Uma
Thurman as Poison Ivy. When Thurman swings her teeny hips and tries for
Mae West double-entendres, she recalls some of Ginger's lesser
seductions of Gilligan. (Scriptwriter Akiva Goldsman must be a big
"Gilligan's Island" fan, because darned if the antidote to Ivy's lethal
kiss isn't lifted directly from a "Gilligan" episode. I'm embarrassed to
admit I know that, but it's true.)
* Central Miscasting - With her baby-fat cheeks and monotone delivery,
Alicia Silverstone is a zero as Batgirl. She has the same problem as Meg
Ryan in Addicted to Love: Ms. All-American trying to come off like
Madonna. And why is supermodel Elle Macpherson, who ably proved her
acting chops in Sirens, reduced to practically a walk-on as Batman's
latest love interest? I'd have believed her as Poison Ivy in a
heartbeat.
* The New Batman - Many have compalined about how enigmatic Batman has
been in these movies, but I thought was part of his point (and his
appeal). George Clooney's effort to "humanize" Batman consists mainly of
smiling a lot.
* The Unsung Hero of the Batman Movies - Once again, Michael Gough as
butler Alfred acts everyone else off the screen just by underplaying.
Director Joel Schumacher seems to have forgotten that the human element
needs to be found amidst the special-effects chaos. Forget Batgirl--I'm
ready for Alfred to join the Batcrew!
Batman and Robin is rated PG-13 for intense situations and violence.
Submitted by: Steven Bailey
http://pages.hotbot.com/movies/skad13
Steven Bailey, a reviewer for The Beaches Leader newspaper in
Jacksonville Beach, Fla., has reviews posted in The Internet Movie
Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Steven+Bailey

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
It's always painful to witness the degradation of someone you dearly
love... to watch, helpless, as a once strong family member succumbs to
illness or the ravages of old age. Gradually the strength and
personality traits that you remember so fondly seep away, leaving only
a shell of the person's former self. They may still breathe, and
perhaps even move around from time to time, but it's obvious that
their spark is gone. Watching it happen to my grandfather was
difficult enough; now we get to see the same thing happen to the
Batman series. 
I was a big fan of the dark vision Tim Burton brought to the first two
Caped Crusader outings. Gotham actually breathed on the silver screen;
it was sinister and full of secrets. Michael Keaton didn't so much
PLAY Batman as become him. The cherry on top was the great
characterization, far more in keeping with Bob Kane's original comic
books than the campy sixties television show. Gone were the WHAPS! and
POWS! of Adam West, replaced with great action sequences and an
intense score from composer extrordinaire Danny Elfman. I even went so
far as to buy one of those goofy T-shirts with the bat logo emblazoned
on it. (Yes, that's right... I was one of THOSE guys.) 
Situations beyond my control prevented me from seeing the third film
(Batman Forever), helmed by director Joel Schumacher and starring Val
Kilmer in the title role, but when the fourth installment appeared in
theaters I was more than game. Another trip to Gotham, with the lovely
and talented Uma Thurman to boot? How could I possibly resist? Ho boy.
How our naivete' mocks us. 
Batman and Robin starts off with an obligatory action sequence, in
which Batman (George Clooney) and his increasingly annoying sidekick
Robin (Chris O'Donnell) attempt to foil Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger) in a diamond robbery. In an interesting interpretation
of physics, Freeze launches our heroes high into the atmosphere in
some sort of rocket-thingy whose purpose is never explained. Batman
urgently tells Robin that they must stop the rocket, because it will
soon explode and turn Gotham into a huge crater. Then, in an amazingly
bold feat of self-contradiction, B&R set the rocket to self-destruct.
How do they escape? Simple. They skateboard back down through the
atmosphere to Gotham. Yes, you read that right. Skateboard. Through
the air. Back down to Gotham. Read it again so your brain absorbs the
absurdity of the situation. Then witness how B&R boldly blow up the
rocket mere moments after explaining the importance of not letting it
explode. 
Next we're off to the Amazon jungle to enjoy the cliched ramblings of
a Dr. Clayton Forrester look-alike as he attempts to turn a 98-pound
weakling into a sumo wrestler via some sort of venom-juice. He is of
course successful, and all goes well until Dr. Unattractive (Uma
Thurman) uncovers the secret plot. The mad scientist isn't happy, and
murders her to emphasize this fact. She rewards him by coming back to
life as a sexy supervillain and killing him with a poison kiss. Lucky
guy: not only does he get to smooch one of the most beautiful women
currently working in the movie industry, but he gets to exit the film
very early to boot. 
Back at Wayne Manor, Bruce Wayne's aged butler Alfred gets a lovely
surprise on the doorstep: Alicia Silverstone, who plays his British
niece, has come for an unannounced visit and apparently left her
accent at home. They fondle each other for a bit in one of the most
disturbing, yet not actually dirty, displays of affection ever
captured on film. Robin becomes infatuated with her, and follows her
one night when she steals a motorcycle to go racing. She of course
gets in trouble and he saves her, because, after all, she's only a
woman. 
In one of my favorite scenes, Robin and the future Batgirl find
themselves dangling off a bridge. Robin has somehow managed to wrap
his foot around a metal bar, which assumedly prevents him from falling
off the bridge into the rushing water below. Visualize with me now: we
have our wormy hero, hanging off the bridge by one foot. He is holding
on to Alicia Silverstone. That's two people, dangling precariously by
one foot. Then, we cut to... the two of them safely back at Wayne
Manor. No explanation whatsoever. To quote Lenny from The Simpsons:
"We won't bore you with the details of our miraculous escape." 
It gets worse. In an attempt to assumedly add a comic-book feel to the
film, the director has inserted cartoon sound effects into the fight
scenes. For example, when one of the evil henchmen falls down a
staircase, we hear a sound similar to Wile E. Coyote plummeting off a
cliff. Whether this was supposed to inspire laughter is unknown. It
did get a reaction from me, though I doubt very much it was the one
the director wanted. 
In the most vomitous feel-good ending of the summer, Mr. Freeze helps
Batman cure Alfred of a crippling disease. It just so happens that
Freeze is the world's leading expert on this particular illness.
That's pushing believability as it is... but would you believe Freeze
just happens to carry the cure around with him at all times? My, isn't
that convenient. 
Next, stir in a lousy soundtrack and lots of people flying around on
wires that are almost invisible during the fight scenes. Add a dash of
some of the most poorly-handled special effects of the summer,
sprinkled in with some gratingly bad puns courtesy of screenwriter
Akiva Goldsman. Is the bile rising yet? 
Arnold's acting has all the depth and range I've come to expect from
his post-Conan movies, which is to say, none at all. His films,
however, are more about attitude than acting, and I can't really hold
his performance against him. In a movie like The Running Man, where
the story is strong enough to let me ignore his terrible line-reads,
it's not a problem... but in Batman and Robin, it's simply one more
thing to bristle at. It doesn't help that most of his dialogue
consists of groanably bad puns, either. And not bad in a fun kind of
way; just really awful. 
Alicia Silverstone is fine in her role, but the part is so poorly
written that it could do her professional reputation more harm than
good. Her character alternates between strong and fragile, determined
and waffling. Poor Alicia; I know she tried hard, and I don't fault
her. Same with Uma and Chris O'Donnell; no problems with them
personally, except they should've had the will-power to turn down a
script this bad. 
This movie also attempts to set the Women's Rights movement back
thirty years. Every woman is portrayed very badly, from the aforemen-
tioned Alicia Silverstone to Bruce Wayne's marriage-hungry girlfriend
(Elle MacPherson). And Uma? Well, Batgirl comments on Uma's character:
"People like you give women a bad name!" True enough. 
If the movie has one good thing, it's George Clooney. Many folks are
in strong disagreement with me, but I thought his performance as
Batman was at least as strong as Keaton's. I don't watch TV, so I've
never seen whatever show he's on (E.R., maybe?), but I liked him here.
Unfortunately, no matter how talented Clooney may be as an actor, he
can't carry a film when the script has him doing nothing more than
standing around, staring, and occasionally barking such helpful lines
as "Let's go!" and "That was close!" But despite all that, Clooney was
surprisingly likeable... which says quite a bit about his screen
presence. 
One of the few things the film gets right is the depiction of Gotham
itself. Like Burton, Schumacher knows how to create memorable images
of a city caught in the struggle of good and evil. Some of the scenes
of frozen city streets (courtesy of Mr. Freeze) are particularly
well-done. Indeed, the lighting, costumes and sets are all lovely...
but a few pretty pictures aren't enough to save this clunker. 
In conclusion: There are worse movies in existence, but it still hurts
to encounter a film this far off the mark. With a better script, this
could've been the ultimate Batman extravaganza; instead, one is left
with what could generously be called a mediocre film. Better luck next
time, Mr. Schumacher. We'll be waiting... same bat time, same bat
channel. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Author
John M. Bozeman
    Tonight I made it to a sneak preview of _Batman and Robin_,
the new Batman movie.  Featured is George Clooney as the newest
incarnation of Batman, with Chris O'Donnell returning as his side-kick 
Robin.  Joining the caped crusaders is Alicia Silverstone as Bat Girl--
who is not the police commissioner's daughter this time (which is
just as well, as most of the police here seem as dumb as a box of
rocks), but rather as Alfred's niece, Barbara, who comes to visit
and then stays after getting kicked out of a posh school somewhere.
And finally, there are the Bad Guys--Uma Therman as Poison Ivy,
and "Ah-nold" Schwarzenegger as Mr. Freeze.
   The strongest part of the movie is certainly not the plot, 
which would have been hard to follow had the film not been
so amazingly unsubtle.  In fact, several plots vie for attention:
on the one hand, there are super villains who must be created
and who then begin rampaging through Gothem City.  However, there
are also problems at home:  Robin is chaffing under Batman's
overly protective tutelage.  Alfred's neice feels that Alfred
has been exploited by Bruce Wayne.  And, worst of all, Alfred
himself is dying.  These various threads do manage to remain
at least tenuously connected throughout the entire movie,
though perhaps at the cost of some depth of characterization.
   But if plot is not the film's forte, what is?  The answer
would probably be spectacle.  On many occassions the film goes
over the top--and keeps on going, and going, and going...
The action is incredible, to the point of being at time preposterous.
The art direction and city design isn't just eye-catching, it is
eye-popping.  The ulimate goal  of  the villains isn't just
wealth, or even world conquest--it is human extinction.  And
in the Bat Cave, the weighty issues of trust and loyalty
are examined.
   So what to make of the film?  On the one hand, we have a
somewhat weak plot.  On the other, we have over-the-top action,
visuals, and melodrama galore.  What makes this combination work
as well as it does is the vital element of humor, which somehow
keeps the film chugging merrily along.  Each of the stars 
have their share of one-liners that serves
both to lighten things up and to humanize the characters.
And, for once, the bad guys don't get all the good lines.
One example:  when Batman and Robin first encounter Barbara
in costume after a fight, they ask her who she is.  
"Bat Girl," she replies.  Batman muses, "That's not very 
politically correct.  How about `Bat Woman'?  Or `Bat Person'?"
   There is also a very funny scene when Batman and Robin meet
Poison Ivy at a charity auction, and she enchants them with
a pheromone dust.  The two heros proceed to bid for her hand.
"One million!" says Batman.  "Two million!" says Robin.
Batman is shocked, as whispers, "You don't have two million!"
Robin replies and says, "I'll borrow it form you!"  
   In conclusion, I would say that the movie rates about
3 stars on a four star scale.  While the the film is a bit long
(about 2 1/2 hours, including previews), contains some serious
flaws in logic, and has special effects that vary from impressive
to just silly, its humor and sheer audacity score a number 
of points.  Also, some of the flaws of the prior movies of 
the series are corrected:  the villains are better drawn and
have interesting motivations; also, one villian does not overshadow 
the other in appeal (as the Cat Woman did the Penguin, or as the 
Riddler did Two-Face).  Clooney is less of a block of wood than
Val Kilmer was.  And gadgets do not overshadow characterization
as badly as in the past.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma
Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Elle Macpherson. Written by: Akiva
Goldsman. Directed by: Joel Schumacher.
The Batty bunch is back! With what is undoubtedly, the 'Cape Crusaders'
corniest and most comic outing.
Every line is a punch line with more misses than hits.
Batman (Clooney), 'I love you old man', shows a more sensitive side to
him; Robin (McDonald), 'I want my own car, the chics love it', also
wants a Gotham emergency signal of his own; Alfred, 'I love you too', is
dying of McGregors syndrome; and Batgirl (Silverstone), 'I love you
Uncle Alfred', joins the gang to battle the villains - the fertile 'my
garden needs tending' Poison Ivy (Thurman), and 'I love my wife' Mr
Freeze (Schwarzenegger).
Gosh there's a lot of LOVE going around! I almost thought they would
break out in a chorus at the end.
All this and more in a day of the life of Bruce Wayne.
Plenty of kiddy fun to hate or appreciate. With a splashy, action packed
opening sequence, which lapses in the middle of the movie, before
picking up again towards the end.
Comment: One happy, loving, batty family which is best appreciated in
the grave.

Author
Kevin Patterson
Film review (C) 1997 by Kevin Patterson
Batman and Robin (PG-13, 1997)
Directed by Joel Schumaker. Written by Akiva Goldsman.
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell.
        I think maybe it's time for the Batman  series to be put to rest. Not
only has the first two films' unsettling insight into what it would really
take for someone to make himself into a "superhero" been abandoned, but this
one throws any lingering realism out the window and goes for all-out camp with
few traces of the self-mocking restraint of the relatively light-hearted third
installment. Let me give you an example: In the first scene of the movie,
Batman (George Clooney) and Robin (Chris O'Donnell) are summoned to a museum
that has been literally turned to ice by Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger) in
an attempt to steal a diamond. Mr. Freeze's thugs are armed with none other
than hockey sticks, but this is no problem for our heroes: automatic skates
shoot out of their shoes, at which point Robin manages to get hold of a hockey
stick, grabs the diamond, and stick-handles it through the museum.
I might have expected this from an Airplane-style farce, but I don't
think that's what this movie is supposed to be. After all, the previous three
Batman movies were actually fairly realistic by the standards of the
superhero/action genre and kept the corny death-defying stunts to a minimum,
while playing the obligatory cheesiness with at least some amount of irony.
Not any more; the list goes on and on in this one. Robin holds onto the
outside of a flying rocket ship 30,000 feet high in the atmosphere, climbing
in the door to save Batman. Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman) leap from
a skyscraper and survive by landing in a small pond. A World Dominating Mad
Scientist lives in a fortress that seems to have been stolen from the old
He-Man  cartoons. My very favorite example is the scene in which Batgirl
(Alicia Silverstone) gets in a race with motorcycle thugs, during which they
come up with the clever notion of dousing the road with gasoline and setting
it on fire to distract her. Not bad, but wouldn't the police (or maybe
Batman?) notice if the road was on fire? I knew Gotham City was this crazy
anarchic place, but . . . .
It also seems that the creators of the Batman movies are obeying some
unwritten rule that there have to be more main characters and plot lines in
each successive installment. As if three protagonists and two villains weren't
enough, Batman and Robin  further weighs itself down with an underdeveloped
side story of the failing health of Bruce Wayne's butler Alfred (Michael
Gough), which might have seemed poignant if it wasn't surrounded by so much
silliness, as well as several scenes with Elle MacPherson as Bruce's
girlfriend which serve no purpose other than to remind us that she is in the movie.
 All this might be semi-excusable if the story were interesting and
entertaining, but it isn't. In fact, it's kind of boring. Mr. Freeze and
Poison Ivy pale in comparison as villains to past baddies such as Jack
Nicholson's Joker and Danny DeVito's Penguin. Their evil plot is as
predictable (Schwarzenegger actually pronounces the words, "Today Gotham City,
tomorrow the world!") as it is lame-brained (didn't it ever occur to Poison
Ivy that freezing the entire world would kill her precious plants too?). And
Robin's constant challenging of Batman mostly just makes him look bull-headed
and stupid and makes us wonder why Batman ever would have taken him on as a
partner in the first place. Strip away the stars, the fancy set design, and
the status as a "Batman movie," and all you have here is another barely
passable summer action flick.
Grade: D+

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        It's always painful to witness the degredation of someone you
dearly love... to watch, helpless, as a once strong family member succumbs
to illness or the ravages of old age.  Gradually the strength and
personality traits that you remember so fondly vanish as the person dwindles
away, replaced by a shell of their former self.  They may still breathe, and
perhaps even move around from time to time, but it's obvious that their spark
is gone.  Watching it happen to my grandfather was difficult enough... and
now I get to see the same thing occur to the Batman film series.  Oh joy.
        I was a big fan of the dark vision Tim Burton brought to the first
two Batman outings.  Gotham actually breathed on the silver screen; it was
sinister and full of secrets.  Michael Keaton didn't so much play Batman as
BECOME him.  The cherry on top was the great characterization, far more in
keeping with Bob Kane's original comic books than the campy sixties
television show.  Gone were the WHAPS! and POWS! of Adam West, replaced with
great action sequences and an intense score from composer extrordinaire
Danny Elfman.  I even went so far as to buy one of those goofy t-shirts with
the bat logo boldly emblazoned on it.  (Yes, that's right... I was one of
THOSE guys.)
        Situations beyond my control prevented me from seeing the third
film ("Batman Forever"), helmed by director Joel Shumaucher and starring Val
Kilmer as the caped crusader, but when the fourth installment appeared in
theaters, I was more than game.  Another trip to Gotham, and with the lovely
and talented Uma Thurman to boot?  How could I possibly resist?  Ho boy.
How our naievity mocks us.
        "Batman and Robin" starts off with the obligatory action sequence, in
which Batman (George Clooney) and his increasingly annoying sidekick Robin
(Chris O'Donnell) attempt to foil Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger) in a
diamond robbery.  In an interesting interpretation of physics, Freeze
launches our heroes high into the atmosphere in some sort of rocket-thingy
whose purpose is never explained.  Batman urgently tells Robin that they must
stop the rocket, because it will soon explode and turn Gotham into a huge
crater.  Then, in an amazingly bold feat of self-contradiction, B&R set the
rocket to self-destruct.  How do they escape?  Simple.  They skateboard back
down through the atmosphere to Gotham.  Yes, you read that right.  Skateboard.
Through the air.  Back down to Gotham.  Read it again so your brain absorbs
the absurdity of the situation.  Then witness how B&R boldly blow up the
rocket mere moments after explaining the importance of not letting it explode.
        Next we're off to the Amazon jungle to enjoy the cliched ramblings of
a Dr. Clayton Forrester look-alike as he attempts to turn a 98-pound weakling
into a sumu wrestler via some sort of venom-juice.  He is of course
successful, and all goes well until Dr. Unattractive (Uma Thurman) uncovers
the secret plot.  The mad scientist isn't happy, and kills her to demonstrate
this.  She rewards him by coming back to life as a sexy super villain and
killing him with a poison kiss.  Lucky guy: not only does he get to smooch
one of the most beautiful women currently working in the movie industry, but
he gets to exit the film very early to boot.
        Back at Wayne Manor, Bruce Wayne's aged butler Alfred gets a lovely
surprise on the doorstep: Alicia Silverstone, who plays his British niece,
has come for an unannounced visit (and apparently left her accent at home).
They fondle each other for a bit in one of the most disturbing (yet not
actually dirty) displays of affection ever captured on film.  Robin becomes
infatuated with her, and follows her one night when she steals a motorcycle
to go racing.  She of course gets in trouble and he saves her, because,
after all, she's only a woman.
        In one of my favorite scenes, Robin and the future Batgirl find
themselves dangling off a bridge.  Robin has somehow managed to wrap his
foot around a metal bar, which assumedly prevents him from falling off the
bridge into the rushing water below.  Visualize with me, now: we have our
wormy hero, hanging off the bridge by one foot.  He is holding on to Alicia
Silverstone.  That's two of them, dangling precariously by one foot.  Then,
we cut to... the two of them safely back at Wayne Manor.  No explanation
whatsoever.  To quote Lenny from the Simpsons: "We won't bore you with the
details of our miraculous escape."
        It gets worse.  In an attempt to assumedly add a comic-book feel to
the film, the director has inserted cartoon sound effects into the fight
scenes.  For example, when one of the evil henchmen falls down a staircase,
we hear a sound similar to Wile E. Coyote falling off a cliff.  Whether this
was supposed to inspire laughter is unknown.  It did get a reaction from me,
though I doubt very much it was the one the director wanted.
        In the most vomitous feel-good ending of the summer, Mr. Freeze helps
Batman cure Alfred of a crippling disease.  It just so happens that Freeze is
the world's leading expert on this particular disease.  That's pushing
believability as it is... but would you believe Freeze just happens to carry
the cure for the disease in his armband?  My, isn't that convenient.
        Next, stir in a lousy soundtrack and lots of people flying around on
wires that are almost invisible during the fight scenes.  Add a dash of some
of the most poorly-handled special effects of the summer, sprinkled in with
some gratingly bad puns courtesy of screenwriter Akiva Goldsman.  Is the
bile rising yet?
        Arnold's acting has all the depth and range I've come to expect from
his post-Conan movies, which is to say, none at all.  His films, however, are
more about attitude than acting, and I can't really hold his performance
against him.  In a movie like "The Running Man," where the story is strong
enough to let me ignore his terrible line-reads, it's not a problem... but in
"Batman and Robin," it's simply one more thing to bristle at.  It doesn't
help that most of his dialogue consists of groanably bad puns, either.  And
not bad in a fun kind of way; just really *awful*.
        Alicia Silverstone is fine in her role, but it's so poorly written
that it could do her professional reputation more harm than good.  Her
character alternates between strong and fragile, determined and waffling.
Poor Alicia; I know she tried hard, and I don't fault her.  Same with Uma
and Chris O'Donnell; no problems with them personally, except they should've
had the will-power to turn down a script this bad.
        This movie also attempts to set the Women's Rights movement back
thirty years.  Every woman in this film is portrayed very badly, from the
aforementioned Alicia Silverstone to Bruce Wayne's marriage-hungry girlfriend
(Elle MacPherson).  And Uma?  Well, Batgirl comments on Uma's character:
"People like you give women a bad name!"  True enough.
        If the movie has one good thing, it's George Clooney.  Many folks are
in strong disagreement with me, but I thought his performance as Batman was at
least as strong as Keaton's.  I don't watch TV so I've never seen whatever
show he's on ("ER," maybe?), but I liked him here.  Unfortunately, no matter
how talented Clooney may be as an actor, he can't carry a film when the
script has him doing nothing more than standing around, staring, and
occasionally barking such helpful lines as "Let's go!" and "That was close!"
Despite all that, Clooney was surprisingly likeable... which says quite a
bit about his screen presence.
        One thing the film gets right is the depiction of Gotham itself.
Like Burton, Schumacher knows how to create memorable images of a city
caught in the struggle of good and evil.  Some of the scenes of frozen
city streets (courtesy of Mr. Freeze) are particularly well done.  The
lighting, costumes and sets are all lovely... but a few pretty pictures
aren't enough to save this clunker.
        In conclusion: There are worse movies in existence, but it still
hurts to encounter a film this far off the mark.  With a better script,
this could've been the ultimate Batman extravaganza; instead, one is left
with what could only generously be called a mediocre film.  Better luck next
time, Mr. Schumacher.  We'll be waiting... same bat time, same bat channel.
This review was originally rewritten: June 22, 1997
Revised: July 2, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Author
Mike Borzumate

For details of my reviewing style, please see the note at the end of
the review.
    What an incredible waste of 130 valuable minutes of my life.  I
absolutely cannot believe how devoid of entertainment value this "film"
proved to be.  Sure, Batman is derived from a comic book, so one should
expect a comic book-like movie.  But this was senseless drivel. 
    George Clooney was almost a competant Batman.  He had the poise and
roughness one expects from a Batman.  I was completely nausiated by his
sad attempts to be boyish and cute, however.  And he seemed unable to
resist doing his little "I can't understand what you just said to me
because I am an airhead" head twist at every plot turn. 
    All other characters (with one exception noted below) were sad, sorry
attempts at believability.  Uma Thurman dragged every line out like her
lips were stuck in slow motion.  Apparently she thought this made her
somehow sexy.  She didn't do a thing for me.  Chris O'Donnell played an
immature, whiney, idiotic Robin who would fall for every painfully obvious
ambush and not learn a thing from it.  "Ahnold" was terrible.  At one
point his dialogue broke down to him babbling something similar to "kill
them, yes yes, kill them!  I want you to crush them!  Kill them!  Haha! 
Kill them, yes yes!"  on and on.  The rest of his performance wasn't much
better.
    I had hoped for so much from Alicia Silverstone.  Every movie in which
I see her, I hope it will finally be the one to make me attracted to her. 
Once again, however, she played an irresponsible, bratty baby.  Moreover,
she was auxilliary and unneeded in this already bloated film. 
    The only character that entertained me (and why this movie didn't get
an even lower rating) was Bane, played by Jeep Swenson.  He portrayed an
excellent big dumb grunt.  He made me show my only emotional reaction
during the whole film (which happened to be laughter). 
    As far as the movie itself goes, the plot is weak, there are too many
major characters, and the script is painfully dumb.
    At least once during this movie I found myself drifting off to sleep.
That isn't entirely abnormal.  The part that surprised me was when I
realized that, had I gone to the cinema alone, I wouldn't have cared if I
slept through the rest.  I would now like to publicly thank my friend(?)
who convinced me to shell out $7.50 for this grand turd of celluloid.
    Do not see this movie unless it is playing on the in-store screens
when you are looking for another video to rent.  Certainly do not see it
in a theatre.

I give two ratings: An arbitrary scale of enjoyability (1 to 10) and
a maximum price I would pay to see the movie.

Author
Hanson Yoo
This is the worst movie I've seen since the "so bad I walked out on it"
"Jingle All The Way".  It is crap on toast made of crap baked in a an
oven fueled by crap.  It is crap through and through.
Nothing works in this film, as to be expected from Joel Schumacher, who
has made only one watchable film in his entire career (that being
"Cousins").  Here's a man who admits he's a medicore director, a rather
charmingly self-effacing statement.  But truth be told, he is much
worse than mediocre.
Not all scorn should be heaped on Schumacher though -- Akiva Goldsman
should not be allowed to write ever again.  There is no plot anywhere,
and the "dialogue" is unrelentingly shallow, preposterous, and boring.
They set up Mr. Freeze as a tragic figure trying to cure his
cryogenically frozen wife, then completely sabotage his character by
giving him the lamest one-liners.  It turns him into a stock maniacal
villain who thoroughly enjoys his villainy instead of a brooding
scientist who has spent much of his life to bringing his wife from the
brink of death.  But that's par for course -- nothing in this film
makes any sense, including half of Arnold Schwarzenegger's lines.  As
Mr. Freeze, Arnold is given way too much dialogue to spit out at once.
This is the same problem he had in "Jingle All the Way", and it seems
that his Austrian accent is getting thicker and more unintelligible as
the days pass.  Personally, I think that he has more pull with the
directors and doesn't retake scenes to make him understandable.
Compare his dialogue in the Terminator series to the load of nonsense
that streams forth in "Batman & Robin".  Apparently, James Cameron
knows how to get a competent performance out of Arnold.
Uma Thurman is not as bad, but nothing resembling good either.  Her
Poison Ivy vamps around terribly, chewing up scenery left and right.
And her Pamela Isley scenes are marred by sub-SNL standard "acting", as
if she's reading off cue cards and is about to laugh at any given
moment.  Given the "script", it's a wonder it didn't happen more
frequently.
There is no redeeming feature in this film -- not George Clooney as
Batman, Chris O'Donnell as Robin, nor Alicia Silverstone as Batgirl.
Michael Gough is eerily sickly looking as Alfred, as if the conceit of
his illness was prompted by his cadaverous appearance.  In fact, there
was something unsettling about his appearance, which seems to have been
accomplished without any make-up tricks, looking as if it were scenes
from a documentary about a dying man.  Unfortunately, every scene about
Alfred's sickness is bungled with such incompetence that there is
absolutely no emotional resonance -- they just go through the motions,
losing whatever impact the scenes were supposed to impart.
The movie is rife with poorly choreographed fights scenes that never
give any sense of a big battle -- you know there's a bunch of people,
but instead of a melee, Schumacher decided to focus on a foot or a
fist.  There's never a moment of awe, wonder, or mayhem.  The only
interesting part of the battles scenes are the freezing effects, which
are impressive (and probably expensive).  Even then, the fights are so
full of camp and stupidity that they become unwatchable.  The hockey
team from hell?  Not even the TV series got that stupid (at least not
on the grand scale of stupidity that "Batman & Robin" showcases).
Frustrating too are the various supporting characters that walk on and
off with nothing to say or do.  Blink, and you'll miss Elle MacPherson
as Julie Madison, Vivica Fox as a "why is she even in the film" vamp in
Freeze's lair (with all of two lines), and Pat Hingle as the most
ineffectual Commissioner Gordan the Batman series ever had.  And in
what almost seems like an effort to save on costs, Vendela Kirsebom has
no lines as Mrs. Fries -- she isn't even filmed well enough to look
good (trust me, she's quite attractive outside of this dreck).
And as if the film weren't bad enough to limp along with bad direction,
bad dialogue, bad performances, and bad fight scenes, there are
inconsistencies and illogic galore.  I know it's nit-picky to ask where
the hundreds of feet of cable are stored in the batarangs, why the
character's arms aren't ripped out of their sockets when they
accomplish a one-armed batarang save after falling hundreds of feet
(while holding on to another person no less), or where the moisture
comes from when Freeze's weapon creates tons if ice.  That's all
traditional comic book stuff.  But why does Batman spring a trap for
Freeze at a public charity event that endanger the lives of hundreds of
by-standers? Why is there a big switch clearly marked, "Heat" in Mr.
Freeze's lair?  Why do countless bumbling police officers even try to
take on Mr. Freeze hand to hand?  Why does Alfred encourage Silverstone
to become Batgirl and even go so far as to have a suit made for her?
Why do Batman & Robin take 10 minutes to bicker before leaving the
Batcave in response to an emergency?  And since it established early on
that Ivy is using pheromones, why don't they wear masks to filter it
out?  I could go on and on.
"Batman & Robin" is a braindead, pointless, garish, loud film that
should still reign as the "worst film of the year" by the time 1998
rolls along.  Note to Warner Bros. -- if you're going to make another
Batman film, please replace Schumacher with nearly anyone.  Because it
could actually get worse than this.  What Schumacher does not
understand is that "comic book" doesn't automatically equal unbearable
idiocy.  The true equation seems to be Schumacher + Batman = unbearable
idiocy.

Author
Bryan Dobson
Staring, George Clooney, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Chris O'Donnell and Uma 
Thurman with Alicia Silverstone. Well to start this off I'd just like to 
say a couple things. First is, I miss Michael Keaton, I miss Tim Burton and 
would much prefer to think that these last two Batman films are all like a 
Dallas dream sequence. 
Not even from the first film was Batman really the 'star' though he was 
damn close in the first couple anyway. In 'Batman Forever' and now in 
'Batman & Robin' he's almost pushed to being a bit player. I can't really 
say if Clooney (who regardless was better than Kilmer) was a very good 
Batman or not. He's given next to nothing to do at all, he might as well 
not have been there and it wouldn't have made much difference.
Now, Joel Schumacher has said that he refuses to bend to the masses that 
have hated his films and cheered for the return of Buton that he wont make 
Batman brooding and dark. Fine, I mean granted 'Batman Returns' while being 
an awsome film was a BIT to dark sometimes. Yet his bright neon, campy 
style is just killing anything this series meant to me. I'm usually very 
easy on films. I loved 'CON AIR' and other films some critics have slammed. 
Granted that film really was paper thin, cliche ridden, except for one 
thing, it was FUN. There is virtually no FUN in this film at all. I 
couldn't have cared less. It'll thrill the little ones as theres no 
violence really, none everyone comes out fine in the end like those old TV 
shows where it ends with everyone laughing.
Schwarzenegger is awful, I mean really, really bad... And this is coming 
from a regular FAN of his work. I love his movies most of the time and the 
basic reason is he never says much in any of them. He talks all to often in 
this movie. I would have much prefered to have seen Patric Stewart in the 
roll. I believe to truely like a film you have to CARE about at least 
someone in a film. I liked Alfred but the reason behind it is a cheap shot.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     While a complete review is in the works, I can report that BATMAN
AND ROBIN is easily the most light-hearted of the franchise.  Though not
quite the camp classic that director Joel Schumacher obviously intended,
it delivers many a hearty Batlaugh, from Schwarzenegger's see-'em-a-
mile-away one-liners to Thurman's wonderfully punny innuendo.  (To the
diamond- stealing Mr. Freeze, Poison Ivy purrs "I'll help you grab your
rocks.")  As usual, the villains steal the show-- what else is new?--
but at least the heroes get a bigger share of the screen time.  Chris
O'Donnell is, again, the most believable on the dramatic front.  Clooney
is the best *looking* Bruce Wayne to date, but, well, he smiles too
much.  Ms. Silverstone, making her debut as Batgirl, is adequate and
little else.  More action-figure action, much of it way-over-the-top,
from sky-surfing without parachutes (!) to a vehicle chase down the arm
of a giant statue.  Great production design, too.  (The most accomplish-
ed of the four films, I'd say).  Like all the Batfeatures before it,
however, the film's greatest failing is in the editing.  Nips and tucks
(and even some slices) are needed all over the place.  And what's with
the repetitive score?  Definitely not for purists.

Author
Ben Hoffman
A new Batman, who when not Batman-ing around town is really Bruce
Wayne (George Clooney); a shiny new Batmobile that can ride upside
down on the ceiling of a tunnel; a new villain, Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger)  Robin (Chris O'Donnell) now has a turbo-charged
motorcycle and is better able to assist Batman; some old character
actors from various prior Batman films;  Michael Gough as Alfred
Pennyworth, Bruce's butler, friend and father figure, and Gotham
City's harried Police Commissioner Gordon (Pat Hingle).
Add to that Barbara Eilson, "Batgirl" (the lovely, sprightly Alicia
Silverstone); the stunning model Elle McPherson who has the role of
Julie Madison, in love with  Bruce.   But the one who grabs the ball
and runs with it through the whole film is Uma Thurman as the
villainous Poison Ivy. In addition to her own shapely lines, Akiva
Goldman who wrote the script has given Poison Ivy the best lines.
Ivy was not always a villain.   She once was Dr. Pamela Isley, a good
person, a botanist, but something happened that turned her into Poison
Ivy whose kiss means death.   Robin comes close to touching lips with
her.   The fact is, Robin has a crush on her and when Batman tries to
warn him about her, he argues that Batman is just jealous because he
is actually in love with her himself.  It looked for a while that
Batman and Robin might actually split up.
Like Poison Ivy, Mr. Freeze was not always a hateful person.  As the
famous Dr. Victor Fries, a molecular scientist, he tried to
cryogenically preserve his wife who was terminally ill so that one day
when a cure was found for her illness, she could be defrosted.
Something went badly wrong with that operation and turned Fries into a
madman, mad at the whole world. Schwarzenegger does a great job as Mr.
Freeze.  He is aided by some fancy special effects that freeze people
and objects when he fires on them with a special gun.  No action
movie, it seems, is anything without special effects;  fortunately for
us, they are getting better and better.
Lots of action, lots of freezing and defrosting and shooting and
terrorizing Gotham but all with humor.  While Batman and Robin go
about their business of saving the city, Freeze and Poison Ivy keep
the film rolling.  They and the special effects are what give the film
whatever value it has.    The visual effects are the work of John
Dykstra.
Directed by Joel Schumacher who also directed BATMAN FOREVER.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
BATMAN AND ROBIN
George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Uma Thurman
Rating: 1 and 1/2  out of five stars. 
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott
For more reviews, go to www,nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
The ads for "Batman And Robin" scream "the event of the summer is here" 
and that's the problem. The producers were apparently so intent on 
creating a spectacle that they forgot to put an actual movie inside of it.
 "Batman And Robin" is 126 minutes of lavish sets, flashy costumes and 
big, confusing fight scenes with barely a hint of substance. It's like 
one of those cheesy Kings Island stage shows; bright, busy and visually 
diverting, but not very much fun.
It wasn't always this way. Tim Burton's "Batman" was an epic story of 
obsession and duality, of darkness and revenge. The film, while far from 
perfect, was a striking mood piece with an otherworldly feel. Batman was 
a creepy, brooding  creature of the night. The Joker, brilliantly 
overplayed by Jack Nicholson, was at once charismatic and repellent. 
Batman and the Joker were opposite sides of the same coin, battling inner 
demons and one another over Gotham City's breathtaking gothic skyline.
Those days of the Dark Knight are gone, replaced by a psychedelic Ice 
Capades run amuck. "Batman And Robin" has far more in common with the 
campy 60's Batman TV show than with Tim Burton's tale of darkness. 
The blame lies with director Joel Schumacher. A former window-dresser, 
Schumacher is adept at decorating sets and dressing people in exotic 
costumes. Unfortunately, when it comes time to have those people walk and 
talk, he hasn't the faintest notion of what to do. "Batman And Robin" is 
overstuffed with intricately choreographed fight scenes so poorly edited 
that it's often difficult to tell who's whacking who. While the 
characters flail at each other, one-liners and bad puns are tossed about 
like confetti. A few carefully placed jokes can set an action movie 
sailing, but too many wisecracks can undermine the momentum of a film. 
"Batman And Robin" doesn't merely lose momentum, it stalls out completely 
on several occasions. It's rare to see an action flick as sluggish as 
this one.
Ironically, the parts of "Batman And Robin" that work are the ones 
showing the characters in street clothing, and most of those succeed 
because of George Clooney as Bruce Wayne. Easily the best Batman yet, 
Clooney's expressive eyes and weary smile gives the character a sense of 
depth that the script doesn't even hint at. The film's most effective 
scene is a tender, quiet exchange between Clooney and Alfred (Michael 
Gough), Bruce Wayne's butler and surrogate father. 
As for the other heroes, Chris O'Donnell's Robin is enthusiastic, perky 
and horny as hell, while pudgy Alicia Silverstone is hard to accept as an 
athlete in her debut as Batgirl. In a movie filled to the brim with major 
characters, the decision to add the entirely unnecessary Batgirl and Elle 
Macpherson as Bruce Wayne's girlfriend is puzzling. I suspect the 
producers inserted the women in an attempt to convince audiences that two 
guys who run around in rubber suits with built-in nipples, shapely 
buttocks and huge codpieces are actually straight.
Of course, the real stars of a Batman film are the villains and that's 
where "Batman And Robin" really suffers. As Mr. Freeze, Arnold 
Schwarzenegger gives his worst performance in years, spitting out a 
stream of lame catch phrases in wooden fashion. Laboring under a ton of 
appliances, Schwarzenegger looks as if he's having trouble even moving in 
his suit, let alone trying to act. Uma Thurman fares somewhat better as 
Poison Ivy. She overacts terribly in the early establishing scenes of her 
character (it's apparently a rule in the Batman series that before a 
person becomes a villain, s/he must be a cartoonish, bumbling nerd). Once 
Thurman transforms into the eco-psychotic Poison Ivy, she does a nice Mae 
West impersonation as a classic vamp who can seduce men with her breath 
and kill them with a kiss. Thurman fails to maintain the character's 
maniacal sense of style though, and ends up merely sputtering her way 
through the latter scenes of the film.
The biggest lesson to be learned from "Batman And Robin" is that more is 
not better. Joel Schumacher fills the screen with eye candy; but the 
Technicolor overkill merely emphasizes what a trifle the film really is. 
Some critics suggest that the Batman series has run out of steam. I don't 
think so. My prescription? Fire Joel Schumacher (but offer him a ticket 
to a rubber fetishist's convention so he'll understand that there's no 
hard feelings). Give Alicia Silverstone her walking papers, while keeping 
Clooney, O'Donnell and Michael Gough. Call Jack Nicholson and Michelle 
Pfieffer and beg them to reprise their roles as the Joker and Catwoman. 
Then, ditch the campiness and, for the love of Pete, lose the "Event" 
mentality and make a movie instead of a spectacle next time.

Author
Chris Casino
* out of **** (Don't say I didn't warn you)
Cast: George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Alicia Silverstone, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Uma 
Thurman, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, Elle Macpherson, Vivica Fox, Vendella. Directed
by Joel Schumaccer, Written by Akiva Goldsmith.
I want to be involved in show business one day. And I refuse to do any sequels to any 
movie I may make because I believe they only get worse. This movie proves it for me.
I was a little worried about the last BATMAN film, as I thought Joel Schumaccer, taking 
over from Tim Burton, would screw it up. I also assumed Val Kilmer would screw up as 
Bruce Wayne. They didn't. Kilmer did a good job, and the cast was left to carry the
movie, which they did (even Jim Carrey as the Riddler and I can't stand Jim Carrey),
because Schumaccer messed up the direction with his glitzy Gotham and his awkward
camera angles. This film is different. The cast is still impressive, but here,
not only does Schumaccer mess up with the direction (he's one of those directors
who's good with actors, terrible with camera angles), but writer Akiva Goldsmith
doesn't really give an impressive cast anything to do.
The cast is impressive: Clooney is a surprisingly good Wayne/Batman, O'Donnell is
a crafty Robin as usual, They could've casted somebody better as Batgirl (my friend
likes Neve Campbell), but Silverstone is not bad, and Thurman is a good Poison Ivy.
The major problem is Schwarzenegger, who is a terrible Freeze. His accent is so heavy, 
you can't understand what he says, and the trouble with action stars like him is they 
cannot act, and they know it, but they figure that if they flex their muscles, say a 
limited amount of stuff, and kill a bunch of guys, then they figure nobody'll notice.
That's the trouble with me, *I* notice. Schwarzenegger does not deserve billing over
Clooney, or as much money as he got for this, but Hollywood thinks he does.
Patrick Stewart was the person I'd heard that was considered to play Freeze,
and he would've been so much better. Or Sean Connery, but not Arnold "I'm not an actor,
but I play one in real life" Schwarzenegger. I realize that you must be a star to play a 
major role in a BATMAN film, but it would've been nice if they'd casted a star that 
had talent for the role.
Akiva Goldsmith's screenplay avoids some stuff that happens in a normal 
Batman film. In a regular Batman film, they'd concentrate on the relationship with the 
girlfriend a little more, but Elle Macpherson's Julie Madison is so limited here that we 
never get a real sense of who she is.
There is talk of a fifth Batman movie. My interest to see it is low, but I hope it's 
better than this. If you don't want to waste your time, rent any of the other BATMAN 
movies from Blockbuster. Any other.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Big, not nearly as bad as everyone had feared. Or hoped. But it's
still a showcase of missed opportunities.
BATMAN AND ROBIN is hardly the worst film I've seen -- that honor right now
goes to the insufferable MONEY TRAIN -- but it's like an anthology of
everything that's currently wrong with popular movies. It's sprawling,
expensive-looking (but fundamentally cheap), pretentiously silly, and,
strangely, not a whole lot of fun. It's also easily the worst of the Batman
movies in general, but that probably went without saying.
George Clooney has been cast as Batman this time around, and he feels
exactly right in the role. This was something I had to work to understand,
because the dialogue he's given and the situations he's forced to sleepwalk
through bury him so badly. The whole movie is like a contest to see which
actor or actress can do the most with the least, and there are a lot of
losers: to name two, Arnold Schwartzenegger is downright embarrasing as Mr.
Freeze; and Uma Thurman doesn't show any visible talent as Poison Ivy.
There's an effort to give both of them deeper shades of character, but they
both fall flat and are lost in the movie's explosion-in-a-prop-factory look.
Come to think of it, the movie is great to look at: the city of Gotham is
rendered in an over-the-top style that could be blown up and hung on the
wall as posters. There's one chase down the arm of a huge statue that stays
in the memory, and the big climax is a whang-dang of a production number
where Mr. Freeze uses a gigantic telescope to ice over Gotham City. (The
freeze-ray effects are worth some kind of technical award.)
The bad news is that all the enjoyment we could have gotten from the lavish
production design is killed, dead, by the movie's abortion of a screenplay.
We spend so much time cringing at the movie's worst excesses, we don't have
time to enjoy the best ones. The movie just isn't very enjoyable: it's like
a desperate birthday party for little kids, where everyone runs around with
forced smiles on their faces and tries to ignore the fact that nobody here
really seems to be having much fun at all.
A friend once asked, "What do you expect from a movie, anyway?" Two things,
I said: either that they show me something I haven't seen before, or amaze
me. This movie tries to do both, and fails.

Author
Jamey Hughton
The number 4 does not seem to be very lucky when it comes to movie
sequels. After the atrocity Batman and Robin, I think that theory has
been more than justified.
The Batman movie franchise has had it's ups and downs. The series
started out with a bang in 1989, as the caped crusader was revived to
fight crime in a darker, moodier Gotham City as envisioned by director
Tim Burton. The box office receipts ensured room for a sequel. And so in
1992, Warner Bros. released the much anticipated Batman Returns, in
which Michael Keaton returned as the title character to fend off two new
super villains. Unfortunately, Burton had gone too far with the darkly
disturbing atmosphere that had inhabited the original, and the sequel
was dismissed by critics and audiences alike for being too dark and
heartless. A change of pace was taken for the third installment, Batman
Forever, including a new capped crusader and a fresh visionary behind
the camera. This Gotham City was more exciting, livelier, and in turn
more entertaining for the younger audiences that Batman had always been
intended for. But as the fourth comic book chapter rolls around, a
painful realization has occurred: just as Burton had let his second
outing with the Bat slip inexcusably through his fingers, Schumacher has
repeated the tradition with a botched sophomore outing.
As the third actor to portray our black-clad superhero, George Clooney
manages fine. He looks entirely comfortable suited up in the Batman
attire, whether acting as the debonair millionaire Bruce Wayne by day or
the elusive crime stopper by night. The performances are not the
problem. I didn't even seem to mind the villains: the chilly Mr. Freeze
(Arnold Schwarzenegger), a deranged former scientist bent on turning
Gotham into a giant icebox, and Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), a seductive
plant women and the result of a bizarre experiment. The general
grievances that I had were based on the preposterous plot, the
slow-moving story, and the wasted production designs. Just as Batman
Forever succeeded with presenting us dazzling visual effects and
elaborate sets, this fourth installment goes totally overkill. There is
so much expensive production at hand that we are nearly lulled to sleep
with the continuing, boring repetitiveness.
The script is also incredibly cheesy. Early on, the Dynamic Duo (with
Chris O'Donnell returning as Robin) have a half-baked hockey game with
Freeze's henchman, using a priceless diamond as the `puck' as they skate
on an icy museum floor. Who would write such mindless crap? There are so
many hard-to-swallow coincidences engraved in the action, which makes it
extremely difficult to enjoy. And then there are a handful of corny one
liners from Schwarzenegger, as he taunts Batman and fellow police with
such quips as `You're not sending me to the cooler!' and `Chill!' I
found Arnie's delivery unintentionally hilarious, although I knew he was
doing his best with the preposterous material.
Batman and Robin is a case of frequent missed opportunities. Alicia
Silverstone makes an appearance at Wayne Manor, playing butler Alfred's
daredevil niece. Silverstone soon becomes Batgirl, but her performance
is devoid of the perkiness or charisma that it takes to be a superhero.
Elle MacPherson has a thankless role as Bruce's current love interest,
with one or two pointless scenes that register as more of a cameo. A
single sub-plot I somewhat enjoyed was the sudden illness that comes
over Alfred (nicely played, once again, by Michael Gough). But so much
of Batman and Robin has been carelessly buried in excessive cheesiness,
making it difficult to enjoy hardly anything without distractions.
Is Batman 5 around the corner? If so, I think the series could use a
severe makeover, starting (vitally) with an abrupt change of director.
While the future of Batman is questionable, it could be salvaged - if
sequels like this one are carefully avoided.
 Contact Jamey at:  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
R.L. Strong
In the continuation of Warner Brother's franchise, Joel Schumacher has
successfully killed this cash cow. What makes this film such a grand
disappointment is the tremendous line up of talented people involved
with the film.
Avika Goldsman's screenplay is such a cluttered mess that there is no
suspense built from one scene to another. This coming on the heals of
such a marvelously written project as "THE CLIENT" is such a shock that
it gives rise to thoughts that the latter film was a fluke.  Situations
are developed and executed with no thought of reason other that to get
the characters from one point to another. This is most glaringly brought
to point by the appearance of Alicia Silverstone's BATGIRL, who just
happens to be Alfred's niece.
The story of Dr. Victor Freeze is told almost completely in dialogue as
an afterthought. While working on a cure for a tragic decease contracted
by his wife, Dr. freeze is injured during a cryogenic procedure, and
becomes a man who can only survive in a sub zero environment. Now of
course he has become a terrorist intent on turning the world into a
frozen planet where only he can live. 
Now the logic of that little sub-plot escapes me. If Mr. Freeze wanted
to find a cure for his wife and bring her back from the brink of death,
why would he want to have her live in a world with no warmth. This is
indeed a cold hearted man. The development of POISON IVY is no less
contradictory. She wants to breed a form of plant life that can defend
itself like an animal. She joins with Mr. Freeze in his plan to start a
new ice age, destroying all animal life, therefore giving her plant
creations no reason to have the defense mechanism she had been trying to
breed into them. The characters have no logic. 
Batman of course is no longer the Dark Knight of the earlier films. Now
that he has an adoptive son in Burt Ward / Robin, Bruce Wayne is trying
to be a Father figure, constantly spouting out homilies about family and
relationships, while at the same time not really having any. George
Clooney tries in vain to keep from rolling his eyes while reciting the
dialogue given him. To say that his performance is workman-like is to be
generous. His best performances are still on "E.R.".
Bruce Wayne has the most unromantic evening with his girlfriend (played
by Elle Macpherson) , that it brings into question Bruce's latent
homosexuality. There is no spark and no passion (as there was for Nicole
Kidman's psychologist in "Batman Forever") between Bruce and anyone
other than Alfred. And even that relationship is very reserved.
Robin comes off less charismatic that in the last film in the series.
Now he's just a spoiled kid. In "Batman Forever", Burt Ward wanted to be
Batman's partner and friend. Now, Robin is suffering from Ego
deficiency. Robin's attraction for Poison Ivy is not believable, except
for a boy around the age of 15. His later flirtation with Batgirl smacks
of incest, even though they are not related in a traditional sense.
Chris O'Donnell, once considered a rising star, successfully burns up on
reentry with this performance. His Robin needs nothing more than a good
spanking. 
The less said about Alicia Silverstone's performance the better. This
talented young actress reads her lines with all the aplomb of a dubbing
actor for a Godzilla film. She was cast strictly for her commercial
value and she knew it. 
This brings us to the villains. Arnold Scharzenegger walks through his
part with all the concern of someone waiting for payday. The most
rediculous scene is during Mr. Freeze's imprisonment. The guards are at
least a foot taller that Arnold and yet fall at his hand in one of the
most unbelievable fights scenes caught on film. It's almost as ludicrous
as seeing Michael Jackson as a gang member.
Umu Thurman struts and coos her way through her part, showing a growing
discomfort with her sex symbol status. Her Poison Ivy has all the come
hither sex appeal of May West in "Sextette" (1978). 
The only performances worthy of notice are Pat Hingle and Michael Gough.
These two seasoned veterans carry their scenes with a dignity sorely
lacking from the rest of the film. 
Without going through the intricacies of the plot, there is one question
that always comes to mind with this series (except for the first
"BATMAN"), and that is how do these super villains manage to hire so
many thugs only to abandon them at the final reel. Mr. Freeze is
introduced with a team of hockey playing hoodlums that seem to have
stepped out of an old KISS music video. Every villain (even the minor
ones) have to have a LOOK, no one can be an individual with day glow
paint on their face or some sort of elaborate costume. 
With this film, Warner Brothers has succeeded in retrograding the series
back to it's TV incarnation. The only thing missing from the action
scenes are the superimposed titles detailing the POWs!, GWAAAA's, and
CLANG's associated with the old series. You almost wonder if William
Dozier, producer of the TV series is collecting royalties from this
film.
The special effects (by John Dykstra) and Production Design (by Barbara
Ling) are the primary stars of this film. And it is a case of
extravagance in the pursuit of nothing. Every set, from Ivy's lair, the
Batcave, to Freeze's hideout is set with enough neon and fiberglass to
keep the EPA in paperwork for years to come. There is no one realistic
set or set piece in the film. Everything is set for maximum exposure.
The special effects have that strange cartoon look that most rushed CGI
effects have. There are homage thrown in by Dykstra and his team to Gene
Warren and his work on "The Time Machine" (the growing plant scene) but
these scenes are so wroth with glaring color and art that they are
almost obscured.
Joel Schumacher has directed the film with no flair. Camera angles are
poorly chosen rehashing set ups from the old TV series. Master shots
pepper the action scenes, destroying any flow of kinetic quality they
may have had. Mr. Schumacher is a good Director. One just has to look
back on the films "The Lost Boys", "Cousins" (an underrated film) and
"The Client" to know that. But "Batman and Robin" comes off as a mated
made for TV movie. The film has no style of individuality. It is the
cinematic equivalent to Jell-O, pretty to look at, but empty.
It is unfortunate that this film, even with it's surprisingly strong box
office has succeeded in doing what Warner's thought Tim Burton would do
with the franchise. Kill it.
Joel Schumacher's "BATMAN & ROBIN" is loud, colorful, action packed, and
ultimately.. boring.
* out of ***** stars.

Author
Jesse Kaplan
Cast Arnold Schwarzenegger, Geroge Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma
Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Elle McPhearson, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle
Directed by:  Joel Schulmaker
I don't even know where to start.  It's this simple:  BATMAN AND ROBIN
is the worst movie I have ever seen in the theatre.  Now I have seen
some bad ones.  CONGO, LAST ACTION HERO, THE BABYSITTER.  But this movie
sucks!!!!!!  I think Ed Wood is spinning in his grave.  I refuse to see
another Joel Schulmaker film again.  Why the hell did they make this
movie anyway?  George Clooney as Batman?  He sucked!!  Arnold
Schwarzengger, in the worst perrormance of his life as Mr. Freeze who
wants to freeze all of Gotham because his wife is dying.  Oh boo-hoo.
Who the hell cares.  Chris O'Donnell in a robin suit with nipples.
AHHH!!!! Someone save me.  Alicia Silverstone as the renegade chick with
attitude who forms yet another partnership in the batcave.  Give me a
break.  Where are the nipples on that costume hmmm?   Uma Thurman as
Poision Ivy? Ohhhh, suductive.  Yuck.  what an awful movie.  Throw in
faithful butler Alfred dying and giving stupid quotes to say along with
Elle McPhearson trying to act as Bruce Wayne's girlfirend and you have
Joel Schulmaker's worst flop ever.  I mean, the guy can direct some good
stuff such as A TIME TO KILL, but this movie is just plain stupid.
Also, I have never see nso much purple in my life!!!!
This is the first movie I am giving a 0.
mmensely by teenagers. I recommend the show to you and give it ***.

Oh yea, YES there is going to be a 5th film of batman.  Rumor has it to
feature the Scarecrow and a female joker of some sort.  Yawn!!  I can't
wait for the Winnie the Pooh film at this rate.

Author
Walter Frith
     Is it just me or is there something wrong with a hero who has to bow
twice in four movies to the villains in first billing?  Jack Nicholson got
billed first over Michael Keaton in 1989 and now Arnold Schwarzenegger has it
over George Clooney.  
     It took at least five movies before there was a change in who would play
James Bond and now we have our third actor in four movies playing Batman.
 Val Kilmer was nothing more than a totem pole and Michael Keaton was a
better Bruce Wayne than he was Batman but Keaton is still the best at both to
this point in the series.  
     Arnold Schwarzenegger is Mr. Freeze, a man who became a criminal after
an accident occurred in his laboratory trying to develop cryogenics to freeze
his terminally ill wife.  Uma Thurman is Poison Ivy, a woman whose noble
efforts as an environmental chemist go awry after a criminal act against her
in South America causes her chemicals to work at making her an evil
temptress.  Both villains are bent on revenge against the system and their
motivation is certainly nothing new for the criminal mind.
     Simply put, 'Batman and Robin' is one of the worst films of 1997 to this
point and has one of the worst screenplays I've ever seen in the history of
cinema.  Cliche ridden dialogue and incoherent situations are bad enough and
on the technical end there is sloppy editing and badly choreographed action
sequnces which are repetitive and boring.  Uma Thurman does the best job with
this awful movie but Arnold Schwarzenegger is laughably bad as Mr. Freeze and
you won't buy his attempt at a menacing presence for a second.  
     Alicia Silverstone is sadly miscast as Batgirl.  Her character is a
cross between a girl scout and a high school student.  Believing she can beat
up criminals is a belly laugh in itself.  Chris O'Donnell's Robin is more of
a spoiled brat than a crime fighter and Clooney's Batman is sorely under
written.  
     The first 'Superman' movie in 1978 was better than the last two Batman
movies put together and Tim Burton's clever and visionary style from the
first two Batman films is missing and director Joel Schumacher and writer
Akiva Goldsman are academic amateurs at best.
     Batman is a legendary crime fighting hero and now he is reduced to
taking a back seat to light shows, computerized special effects and art
direction done with over kill.  Doomed from the beginning, 'Batman and Robin'
is machine tooled junk.

Author
Max Scheinin
Released 1997, will hopefully be immediately forgotten
A master-of-disaster, Joel Shumacher film,"Batman And Robin".
Starring: George Clooney, Chris O' Donnel, Arnold Schwarznegger, Alicia
Silverstone, Uma Thurman, Michael Gough all in embarrasing star turns
except for Uma and Mike who have nothing to do.
Rating: Zero stars
[NEWSFLASH!] Important: all lovers of the character "Batman" tune in
immediately. The latest Bat flick is in and we have the scoop on it: it's
not as terrible as you thought it would be...it's worse. Chris O' Donnel is
foremost in stinking up this miserable wreck of a "film". Arnie isn't far
behind though. In fact, with the notable exception of Uma Thurman who is
entertaining as Poison Ivy ( and the only reason I didn't walk out ) all
members of the cast suck. It feels like a long time since  Tim Burton made
his wonderful first film; today we are being fed this awful gruel and I
don't like it. We are not amused.
The film takes no time in falling flat on it's face. After the credits the
one-liners start rolling in as Batman And Robin  hop in their car and speed
off to fight the diabolical Mr. Freeze ( whadaya know, they keep ice skates
in their shoes, ain't that clever? ). Not only does the following action
sequence make absoloutely no sense, it serves absoloutely no purpose in the
story. Of course if it was exciting and well edited that wouldn't matter (
the cliffhanger in The Lost World served no purpose, but it was a brilliant
scene and helped out an entertaining movie ), but it isn't. Not only did I
have no idea what was going on, I had no interest in what was going on. And
that's how I felt through out this entire movie. You see, there are no
characters, no plot, no attempt to make the audience care what is happening
on the screen. 
And entire scenes are shot in huge stupid looking sets, where Bane and
Poison Ivy grunt stupid things to eachother. Which brings us to the
dialogue, which is non existent, because nobody talks to eachother. They
talk to themselves ( by the end of the movie I was too ) trying to impress
someone with there stinging wit ( "I want a car...chicks dig the car";"This
is why Superman works alone" ) and never suceeding. This film is truly
painful to watch.
Batman And Robin is a thought provoking film; why does Robin's costume have
nipples? Where are the nipples on Batgirl's costume? Where did these people
learn to "act"? Who cares? Why the hell was this movie made?
I have the information on Batman And Robin's running length somewhere
around here, but I'm not going to take the time to look it up, because
anybody stupid enougth to go see this movie after reading the above review
doesn't really need to know the running length. The film is rated PG-13
because they wanted to attract a certain audience to see it and didn't
suceed. It should be rated R. It is not accceptable for anyone of any age.
Some of the sets are good, but that doesn't stop me from knowing that the
movie sucks. I give it no stars. See Contact or Hercules instead. 

Author
Grant Watson
BATMAN AND ROBIN
Directed by Joel Schumacher. Written by Akiva Goldsman.
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger (Mr Freeze), George Clooney (Batman),
Chris O'Donnell (Robin), Uma Thurman (Poison Ivy) and Alicia
Silverstone (Batgirl).
First, some personal history.
   I grew up from a very early age as a tremendous fan of Batman. He
was my favourite character in the animated series "Superfriends". I
read his comics at every opportunity. When the "Superman" movies were
in the cinemas I spent a lot of time wondering why no one made a
Batman movie.
   In 1989 I rushed to the cinemas to see "Batman", and loved what I
saw. It made me an instant Tim Burton fan (I still am), introduced me
to Jack Nicholson and convinced me that Michael Keaton was one of the
best actors in Hollywood. More than anything, it convinced me of the
utter brilliance of Batman: as a character, a concept and as one of
few genuine mythic heroes of the 20th century.
   In 1992 I watched "Batman Returns" and loved it just as much. When
Warner Bros started a new animated series, I watched and loved that as
well. I'm currently even basing part of an Honours thesis at
university on the guy.
   My point is that out of all the fictional characters that I read,
watch and love, Batman is pretty well up near the top. So when Joel
Schumacher directed the abysmal "Batman Forever" in 1995, I was
certain that the Batman film franchise had hit an all-time low.
I know what you think I'm going to say now, but my purpose for all
that is a little different.
   You see, I went into "Batman And Robin" expecting quite literally
the worst film I would ever see. I was expecting the most
mind-bending, thought-numbing, heart-wrenching heap of manure that I
had ever been forced to endure. Every friend I had who had already
seen it told me not to bother: to save my money and go see something
else - *anything* else.
Surprise, surprise. "Batman And Robin" is actually pretty good.
   Certainly it has monumental problems. Firstly, Akiva Goldsman's
screenplay is badly conceived, ill-plotted and filled not so much with
dialogue as with a string of unfunny one-liners and puns that would
have had Adam West and Burt Ward quaking in their boots.
   Similarly, much of Joel Schumacher's direction is gratuitous,
overly flashy and confused.
   The production design is hideous, with excessive neon lighting, 40
story statues built around the city and a Batmobile even sillier than
the last one.
On the *other* hand...
   The actors all cope very well with what they're given. George
Clooney is convincing as Batman, and does a reasonably good job as
Bruce Wayne. Chris O'Donnell, one of the very few highlights of
"Batman Forever", keeps his good effort up in his second involvement.
Uma Thurman hams it up wonderfully as Poison Ivy, while Alicia
Silverstone is passable in a role that Goldsman's script tends to
forget with frightening regularity. It is only Arnold Schwarzenegger
who sticks out in the cast, fluctuating wildly between a
one-dimensional wisecracking villain and a tragic character destroyed
by the events of his life. One or the other (preferably the latter of
the two) would have been good. Leaping from one to the other, he
merely created a confusing mess.
The music this time around is an improvement, and the Smashing
Pumpkins song at the end outdoes U2's effort completely. The costumes
for Batman, Robin and Batgirl are all very good, with the strange
nipple fixation the only drawback to an otherwise impressive look.
"Batman And Robin" is very big, extremely loud and undeniably very,
very stupid. In terms of scripting and direction, it's a careering
disaster in the making, it's cast holding on for grim life from one
collision to another.
   But it's also very, very fun to watch. And let's face it, that's
what these kinds of movies are all about.
Review copyright (c) 1997, Grant Watson (nzone@iinet.net.au). It may
be reprinted freely, as long as the author is notified.
__________________nzone@iinet.net.au_______________
"Science fiction is about the future and fantasy
is about the past - the myth of the way things used
to be. Science fiction is, in a sense, trying to
construct a myth of the future."

Author
Michael Redman
(Note: Beginning in my single digit
years, I grew up with Batman in the comic book form. I survived the
goofy Batman of the late fifties and early sixties and the "pop"ular
Batman of the mid-sixties, cringed in embarrassment at the "Pow! Zap!"
Batman of the television series and finally found _my_ version in
the grim dark night avenger which reprised the original version of the
character. Having a well-defined Batman in my imagination for decades
definitely colors my view of the cinematic Batmans. You've been
warned.)
The film version of Batman has never been done right and they are
getting worse over the years. As the series of films continue, the tone
of the movies appears to draw more from the television series of 30
years ago than from the comic book. Obviously the slam-bang antics we
see on the screen draw in more thrill-seekers than would the deadly
serious vigilante.
George "I'm not a doctor, but I play one on TV" Clooney is the latest
in the never-ending series of actors to slip on the cowl and he's really
not too bad at filling in the rubber suit. He looks good: much better
than Michael Keaton who was surprisingly adequate himself and equal to
Val Kilmer. Of course, with the acting skills called upon by the role,
just about anyone could fit the role as long as he possessed the
required strong jaw.
One of the many problems with this film is that we now have a kinder
and gentler Batman. Rather than the shadowy brooding character that
supposedly populated the first three films, our hero here is a
wise-cracking Father Knows Best. Not the best persona for a champion who
chose the bat as a symbol to "strike fear into the hearts of criminals".
Chris O'Donnell returns as Robin and is the most successful at creating
a three-dimensional human being. While he began his Boy Wonder career in
the last film with unsure footing, by the middle of this one he has a
secure sense of  the sidekick.
The Batman mythos has an enormous stable of colorful and dangerous
arch-foes. It's easy to understand the filmmakers' (in this case Joe
Schumacher) temptation to showcase them. After all, with the way they
have chosen to present Batman, the bad guys are much more interesting.
Thus we come to another failing with the films. There are so many new
characters and sub-plots introduced that by the time all that happens,
there isn't much space for a movie.
Here we have Mr. Freeze, Poison Ivy, Bane, Batgirl as new characters.
Toss into the mix Alfred's deadly illness, Freeze's attempts to
resurrect his cryogenically preserved beloved wife, Ivy's
ecologist-gone-wrong crusade, Batgirl's leaving school and closet biker
babe life, Batman and Robin's bickering and half a dozen other story
elements and you get a film that is held together with a shoestring.
It's traditional to attract big names to play the Bat villains and this
movie is no exception. Arnold Schwarzenegger is a stand-out as the
frigid Mr. Freeze. With his blue flecked skin and bald head and booming
voice, Ahnold fits the role to a T.
Uma Thurman is less triumphant as Poison Ivy, the plant and snake venom
temptress with the deadly kiss. Thurman can be seductive and that is
what the role calls for, but all we get is cartoon allure. On the bright
side, she does have the best lines in the film, puns that they are.
The less said about Bane (Jeep Swenson), the better. In the comics,
Bane was presented as Batman's superior in strength and intelligence and
the only enemy to ever best the hero, breaking his back and putting him
into retirement for a year. Here he is a grunting chauffeur on steroids.
Even the animated version had more depth.
Alicia Silverstone as Batgirl is a throwaway character. Alfred's niece
who comes to stay in Wayne manor discovers the truth about the
happenings in the caves below and overnight becomes a super heroine.
Silverstone comes off as nothing more than a chubby spoiled high school
girl who always gets her own way. Oddly enough in the suiting-up scenes
with the traditional Bat close-ups on the chest, crotch and buttocks, it
is apparent that Batgirl's black suit isn't quite as anatomically
correct as are the men's. In the topsy-turvy world of Batman, men have
nipples and women don't.
As usual, the visuals are dynamic. Mr. Freeze's cold gun spreading ice
throughout Gotham is a highlight. The real star of the film continues to
be Gotham City itself. The architecture is spectacular. A city that
could exist only in Art Deco nightmares. The observatory held aloft in
the arms of an enormous statue is remarkable.
(Footnote: The direction that the Batman films have taken is probably
unstoppable. I'll never see _my_ Batman in the silver screen. In my
mind a younger Clint Eastwood is Bruce Wayne. It's not too late: the
current Eastwood would be perfect in a cinematic version of Frank
Miller's classic "The Dark Knight Returns". Only in my dreams.)
[This appeared in the 6/26/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
 Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Author
Steve Kong
"Bring back Tim Burton! Bring back Tim Burton!" the little voice in the
back of my head kept screaming, and this was only five minutes into Batman
& Robin. The voice got louder and louder as the movie got worse and worse.
I've always loved Batman, from the cheezy campy TV show that I watched as a
kid to the comics to the Tim Burton movies to the animated series. When
Joel Schumacher came on board with the third installment of the big screen
Batman series, I thought he made a decent attempt a directing Batman
Forever. Sure, Forever had a different look and a different -- more action
-- feel to it, but it was a fun film.
With Batman & Robin it looks like Schumacher wants to take the series back
to the old days of the Batman TV series, adding a full compliment of
campiness to it. I'm thankful he hasn't -- yet -- brought the big exploding
lettered action cards to the big screen (remember? BLAM! CRASH! ZOW!) But,
Schumacher comes pretty close to it. To say the least, Batman & Robin is
the worse of the big screen Batman series. To be even more honest, it's one
of the worst big budget movies I've seen this year.
The script by Batman Forever's Akiva Goldsman is so paper thin that I'm
hesitant to even waste time explaining it. In one sentence: Mr. Freeze and
Poison Ivy want to kill Batman, Batman and Robin want to kill each other,
and we get a new add-on rubberized suit super heroine.
How's George Clooney as the new face behind the mask?  Clooney gives an
admirable performance as Batman, and is the only actor in Batman that is
not over-the-top or sliding deep past overacting. I like Clooney as Batman
more than I did Kilmer, but I still think that Michael Keaton is the real
Batman.   Chris O'Donnell is annoying as the annoying Dick Grayson/Robin.
Arnold Schwarzenegger must have been paid a lot of money to throw his
reputation on this awful movie.  He gives the worse performance of the
whole cast of big name stars.  His overacting is unbearable.  Uma Thurman
does a bit better than Arnold Schwarzenegger, but not by much.  And Alicia
Silverstone looks like she can barely fit into that kinky rubbersuit.
As for Clooney, of the three action films that I've seen of his -- Batman &
Robin, The Peacemaker, and From Dusk Till Dawn -- this is the worse film of
his action career.  He's a good actor, and he really deserves better that
any of his previous action films.  If you want to see Clooney in a somewhat
decent action movie, try The Peacemaker.
Schumacher has brought the whole Batman series to its lowest point with
this film.  And with rumors of another film in the series, I have only one
piece of advice for the studios, "Bring back Tim Burton!  Bring back Tim
Burton!"  As much as I like Clooney as Batman, at this point just about
anyone can be Batman.  Burton's Batman was a dark man living in a dark
world.  Schumacher's Batman is a cardboard cutout comic character running
around like a headless chicken in a comic book world.
Batman & Robin is just plain awful.  Save your money.  Miss it, Miss it,
Miss it.  I'm sorry I spent the two hours watching this film.  The only
thing that carried me on watching was to see how much worse the film could
get.  And after the first few minutes when the film starts to go down hill,
the hill becomes intangibly more steep as each passing minute comes along.
This film is not fun it's just painful.  Save yourself from the pain.

Author
Homer Yen
Batman & Robin: Freeze Adds Warmth but Poison Ivy Irritates
Somewhere in the middle of the movie, Bruce Wayne reflects on his firm   
need for control and asks his longtime-faithful friend and servant,   
Alfred, for his opinion.  Alfred's response is an apt one.  "What is   
Batman if not an attempt to master the chaos that surrounds us."   
 However, while the Dark Knight has the ability to master his own   
destiny, Joel Schumacher, the director of this and the last Batman movie   
(Batman Forever) doesn't really have the talent to master the amount of   
chaos that runs rampant through this latest movie featuring the caped   
crusader.
What we get is an offering filled with ingredients that don't necessarily   
compliment each other or ingredients that get completely lost in the mix.   
 And that's too bad, because the movie begins with a terrific punch as we   
are introduced to two developing story lines.  One is the emergence of   
Batman's latest superfoe, Mr Freeze, played by the imposing Arnold   
Schwarzenegger.  His story is actually quite poignant - as a leading   
scientist, he has cryogenically frozen his wife who suffers from a rare   
disease for which there is no known cure.  While trying to discover a   
cure, he accidentally falls into a vat of cryogenic fluid.  His body   
mutates and now he can only survive in extremely cold temperatures.  He   
wears a cold suit, wields an ice ray gun and must steal diamonds to not   
only power his suit but to complete his superweapon for reasons that are   
equally nefarious as they are noble.  And, we also begin to see Robin's   
desire for more respect, more trust, and more equality in the   
crimefighting partnership.  Perhaps a Robin signal would do?   This   
simmering rift between the two crimefighters evolves into an interesting   
look into their partnership.  Unfortunately, it is one of 8 different   
storylineswhich is about 5 too many.
For example, there is also a warm piece centered on Alfred's   
deteriorating health, the comeuppance of Batgirl (Alicia Silverstone),   
the creation of another foe in the form of Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), and   
Bruce Waynes's road towards possible marriage.  It gets very difficult to   
filter out all of these stories because there is so much to explore that   
not enough time could be adequately given to the stories that could have   
made this the best of the Batman movies.  There is a veritable buffet of   
stories and sub-plots.  Additionally, we are treated to stunning visual   
effects and gorgeous set pieces.  The gargoyles that overlook Gotham   
City, the menacing shadows that tease the streets below, and the stunning   
architecture are incredible.  Those cool set pieces could go head-to-head   
with those in Blade Runner or the 5th Element.  However, they tend to   
distract us from the really good stuff.
Personally, I would have preferred Mr. Freeze as the lone villain and   
more time devoted to Batman v. Robin instead of Batman & Robin.  Also,   
giving more screen time to Alfred was a good move.  These are the stories   
that could've really carried the movie.  If you haven't seen it yet, but   
decide to, these stories are the ones that you should try to concentrate   
on.  You can filter out the rest.  Surprisingly, the alluringly kinky   
Poison Ivy didn't do that much to "bud" my interest as Mr. Freeze's   
partner in crime - she just seemed out of the mix.
Clooney makes a fine Bruce Wayne (better than Val Kilmer), who not only   
looks great in the Batsuit, but also possesses some depth.  Ah-nold and   
Uma Thurman also seem to relish their roles.  Chris O'Donnell (Robin) is   
as perky as ever, and Michael Gough (Alfred) is reliably good as Wayne   
Manor's caretaker.  However, I was not particularly taken either way with   
the inclusion of Alicia Silverstone as Batgirl.
After the strong start, things start to get bogged down as all of the   
story lines come into play.  It becomes a jungle of underdeveloped or   
semi-developed plots.  But there is sufficient action to keep us   
interested in the conclusions and lots of eye candy to keep us visually   
stimulated.  Additionally, a fairly strong ending helps to rescue this   
movie from becoming a frozen wasteland.  Ahstyle over substance  a   
common dilemma for summer movies.  But, if your idea of a good time in   
summer is simply to see a movie that moves, has lots and lots of combat   
toys and swirling action, then Batman & Robin will help you in your   
crusade.

Author
Dan Kim
    Where to start. This movie has all the substance and believability
of a Steven Segal movie. It's almost hard to fathom that Warner Bros.
actually greenlighted this waste of celluloid that people have the
nerve to call a "movie".
    "B&R" had all the right stuff, it seemed, on paper; a solid cast, a
normally reliable director, and a credible studio backing. It's the
writing and director Joel Schumacher's cartoonish direction that
flushed  it down the drain straight to movie hell.
    The "plot" suffered from the odd sensation of not quite having a
start, beginning, and an end. It starts off decently with the opening
credits, and the very well done score by Danny Elfman. Things start
going south with the very first line of the movie, spoken
unconvincingly and quite annoyingly by O'Donnell. The rest of the movie
is a wretched mix of cartoonish action, horrible one-liners, insipid
dialogue, an endless sea of neon objects, and way too many Bat-tools to
keep track of.
    It's hard to believe this is from the same guy that directed
"Batman Forever" and "A Time to Kill". Much of the "action" asks the
viewer to suspend reality to an unrealistic degree. Scenes with Robin
flying through the air, Freeze swinging from vines, the rocket from the
back of the Freezemobile, never mind that at 30,000 feet any normal
human would die, never mind that we're asked to believe Robin can hang
on the side of launched rocket traveling at a velocity sufficient
enough to send it into orbit by virtue of Bat-magnets.
    The cast, while on paper seemed right, was overridden with bad
lines. Viewers are delt a barrage of terrible one-liners and puns. And
oh, there is way too many comments referring to coldness, ice, freeze,
etc. To call it a dialogue is a gross overstatement. Clooney was decent
choice to play Bruce Wayne/Batman, but he wasn't really acting in the
movie. He did what he does in almost every roles he's given which is
basically charm the audience, head tilt and all. Arnold gives what
might arguably his worst ever performance in his entire career. It
seems that lately, only James Cameron is able to squeeze out a passable
line out of him. Poison Ivy spent the half the movie talking to
herself. O'Donnell's Robin was quite the little punk, and his
rebellious character got old to the point that one would hope Batman
goes solo his next time out. It doesn't say much for a movie when the
best acting was done by a supporting character, which in this case,
Alfred is expertly played as always by Gough. When Alfred's mortality
becomes an issue, it adds the only real character depth to the movie,
but it's much too little. Other cameos (Elle Macpherson, Vivica Fox) in
this movie were so incidental as to be almost forgettable. Silverstone
was, well, Silverstone.
    The most glaring fault was the departure from the traditional
"Batman" mood set so well in the comics. Gotham is a dark, moody city
even in the daytime and Tim Burton set this tone brilliantly in the
first "Batman". Same goes for the Batcave, which is made up to resemble
a laser-tag arena. It's not this bright, neon-slathered pseudo-Las
Vegas Schumacher makes it out to be. Batman himself is a dark,
brooding, character who doesn't say much to begin with while Bruce
Wayne is an suave yet slightly awkward person. Clooney, while looking
very much the part, doesn't help by trying to add a lighter side to
both. Also in the comics, Robin is hardly a partner to Batman. nor is
he such a rebellious brat as shown here. These faults are due mainly to
the director and the writing staff.
    Character moments suffered in this movie. There is almost no
development into the relationship between Wayne and his current
girlfriend Julie Madison. The bickering between Batman and Robin gets
old real fast. Freeze's desires to freeze the world is mentioned only
in passing, just the audience has some idea why he's doing this, and
how he came to be this way. The only parts worth watching in the movie
is the too-brief moments between Bruce and Alfred. The mildly touching
scenes adds a touch of humanity to an otherwise gimmicky movie.
    The Batman movie series has always been about the villains, and
here it falls flat on it's face for the reasons mentioned. Also
straying from the comic norm is the character of Bane. In the comics,
Bane is intelligent as well as inhumanely strong, not the brainless,
monosyllabic lump  he's portrayed as here. Despite going maniacally
overboard, neither Freeze or Ivy measure up to the villains played any
of the previous movies.
    The entire movie reeks of the campiness from the old Adam West
series back in the 60s. I left the theater thinking all the movie
missed was the "Pop! Bang! Whack!" graphics of old. Incidentally, there
are strong but unconfirmed rumors going around that Schumacher actually
wanted these touches in the final cut, but was (fortunately) rejected
by Warner Bros.
    This is a pretty bad step for the Batman franchise. Next time
around, get rid of Schumacher, Silverstone, and maybe O'Donnell.
Clooney is fine as the Dark Knight, but make sure he stays true to form
as portrayed by the comics, in other words, he needs to expand his
acting abilities. Bring back the dark, gothic look of  the first Gotham
city and then maybe, there's hope that "Batman" will once again be
something worth watching.

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) When the first "new" Batman movie was released 8 years
ago, nearly everyone made something out of how dark it was. People
either loved the new tone of the movie or they missed the camp of the
old TV show. With the latest installment in the current series, it seems
that the pendulum is swinging back. 
BATMAN & ROBIN is more campy and less dark than any of its recent
predecessors, but it's hard to decide if that's bad or good. On the one
hand, the dark tone was hard to sustain for two hours - both for the
filmmakers and for the audience. On the other hand, now we are bombarded
by dumb jokey lines like those from the TV series, and we don't have a
mute button. 
In the first "action" sequence, after Batman (George Clooney) makes his
Fred Flintstone-like entrance via the frozen back of a dinosaur, hordes
of cartoonish villains "fight" Batman and Robin (Chris O'Donnell) while
everyone makes lame hockey jokes. This first sequence is the worst in
the film for cheesy camp, so at least the movie gets better as it
progresses. But those first impressions are hard to change. 
This time around bat-villains Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger) and
Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman) conspire to wipe out Gotham - Freeze in a
misguided revenge plot and Ivy in an attempt to end oppression of plants
by animals (notably men). 
Freeze is a villain, no doubt, but he is also a dupe - he is much less
evil than Poison Ivy. Considering Schwarzenegger's shoot-to-WOUND role
in TERMINATOR 2, I wonder if he has a clause in his contract that
stipulates his characters must have some redeeming qualities. I also
wonder if his conservative politics had anything to do with evil Ivy's
association with environmental extremism. 
There are some plot threads that deal with the addition of Batgirl
(Alicia Silverstone) to the family, the terminal illness of loving
servant and father figure Alfred (Michael Gough), and the jealous
sibling rivlaries that arise between Batman and Robin. 
Actually, the "family" subplot of this movie was more thoughtful and
honest about family matters than most kids movies are. BATMAN & ROBIN
deals with trust, competition, caring for elderly family members, and
the sacrifices of parents for their children. Don't get me wrong. Most
of the movie is look and action; not plot. But still, it was nice to
include a bit of thoughtful fluff in this episode. And while the Michael
Medveds complain about a lack of "family"-oriented movies, a big bad
action movie gives them just what they asked for - but not necessarily
what they wanted. (Goes to show how misued the word "family" is in
political and critical circles.) 
It's hard to evaluate "acting" in a movie like this, where the sets,
costumes and special effects take center stage, but a good performance
is still important. 
I had very low expectations for Schwarzenegger, who got top billing. He
wasn't as bad as I had feared, which is not to say that he was very
good. Clooney gave the best performance yet as Batman/Bruce Wayne.
Michael Keaton made a good Bruce Wayne in the earlier movies, when the
neurosis of creating a superhero alter-ego was explored. But Clooney
makes a more confident, mature, approachable, and likeable Wayne. (Val
Kilmer was practically invisible as the last Wayne/Batman.) Chris
O'Donnell's youthful charm ordinarily makes him hard to take seriously,
but he's perfect for the role of Robin. 
But as I mentioned, the stars of this movie are the modelmakers,
costumers, and special effects technicians. Gotham's architecture was
nicely displayed, the oppressive size and weight of the city came across
well, the cartoonish sets were elaborately decorated, and the special
effects were seamless. 
There are significant differences between BATMAN & ROBIN and the
previous Batman movies, in scope, in tone, and in the details. But if
you've seen the others, then you know what you're getting into. If you
liked the last ones, chances are you'll like this one. 
By the way, depending on your intestinal fortitude, you may want to
stick around for the credits. The second song that plays over the
credits - GOTHAM CITY by R. Kelley (aka Love Theme from Batman & Robin?)
- is really awful. It's so bad that it's funny, but it is not for the
weak.
(c) 1997 Marty Mapes
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/
